When the existing power structure of a culture relies upon maintaining an underclass, it’s in the best interests of the ruling class to convince that underclass that their subjugated state is natural, desirable and something that they have themselves chosen as the best option for their lives. The ruling class does this not because they believe the underclass to be less intelligent and therefore more easily swindled. Rather, they push this idea because they know the underclass to be smart–smart enough to figure out that they’re being oppressed unless that oppression is sold to them as freedom. In terms of maintaining sexist power structures, that means convincing girls and women (in part) that they’re far better served wasting colossal amounts of time and energy making themselves into decorative objects or mobile household appliances than spending time getting education and job skills. Any hour a woman spends on getting her hair and makeup just right is an hour she’s not dedicating to developing the skills that matter for something other than attracting a shallow mate. Keep ‘em busy on a never-ending treadmill, and they’ll never go looking to roam somewhere else.
In 1996, D.S.A. sent six staff members into the field for the final weeks of the election campaign. These staff and D.S.A. volunteers "contributed to the re-election of Senator Paul Wellstone and Congressman Maurice Hinchey (D-upstate NY)."
March's Word Play chart without adding this motif....
Source: The Herald Online
See you in the dream time. Hanukah.
Because I'm not working. I'm not in school. I haven't found someone to apprentice to. I'm still just writing, researching, planning travels to a couple places, on very limited funds...
"I'm not running with you, I've drank too much and you must know by now that I don't run...he might though?"
How are your sales? How is listing going?
Nitin Walia, Director, Bharat Sync, said, “This MoU not only reinforces our leadership in mobile emails and PIM sync users, it also extends our footprint in what is an exciting and fast‐growing telecom sector worldwide. We have also signed up an MoU in South Africa and will be soon launching the services there also. The rise of a huge number of users across world has caused telecom companies to offer services that offer mobile users to easily access email services. The services in Mauritius are commercially getting launch and will be available for all MTML GSM mobile customers across Mauritius from 1st May, 2012.”
1st was good. We stayed the night at the Ritz Carlton. (we have a hook up for that)
3: perfectus – perfect
So, as you can see, I'm a huge fan of Karen's Cookies web site. A great online store, wonderful recipes, and awesome tutorials. Now I'll be looking at more cookie cutters and I wonder how long it will take to complete the purchase this time?
I know that most of you depend greatly on your federal paycheck, and look forward to receiving your federal pension. Millions of us are in a similar boat. We all have bills to pay and kids to feed. However, while you ponder your need for your federal paycheck, remember that FBI also stands for Fidelity, Bravery, and Integrity.
So, since I already have a copy of Masque of the Red Death and I've never read the other Morganville Vampire books, I am giving one lucky winner the chance to choose between the two.
the power of words
Indeed, the air is sweet with the smell of wort. That’s the sugary extract or pre-beer yet to be fermented. This batch will eventually become an IPA -- the standard bearer of Northwest Beers. Most breweries in Bend have one. And according to Barnett most of them are really good.
¤ Do you Need to Naturally lower your blood pressure?
in smoke-mirled, blue-
Today I drove over to Cape Canaveral to visit the Kennedy Space Center. Awesome! But there's too much to see; apparently I should have seen the Imax and ridden the shuttle simulator, but I didn't get there till around 1 pm, and as mentioned, I am kind of low energy today.
Ink, Sweat & Tears pushes the boundaries between poetry and prose. It publishes experimental writing of the highest quality, encouraging people to take risks and offering truly original writing to the world. It is a perfect home for my work — thanks to Kate, and to Ink, Sweat & Tears’ editor-in-chief Helen Ivory for publishing my story.
The Attorney General directed all U.S. Attorneys’ Offices with districts containing Indian Country (44 out of 93) to: meet and consult with tribes in their district annually; develop an operational plan addressing public safety in Indian Country; work closely with law enforcement to pay particular attention to violence against women in Indian Country and make these crimes a priority; and to provide summaries of their operational plans to the Office of the Deputy Attorney General and make those summaries available to the tribes in their districts .
Our Registration deadline is firm. Register early and get started on your pieces! This year we are capping the number of participating artists at 600. Although this sounds like a lot, every year the response exceeds our expectations – so register as soon as possible. Please forward this message to any artists you feel may be interested in taking part.
Second name drawn will get a hard copy of The Guardians of the Hidden Scepter. Also WICKED!
From one extreme to the next. Light espresso nose. Black night color with a creamy head. It tastes like coffee, has a thin body, and is a touch watery at the back of the tongue. Low 3 Stars. The more I drink it the coffee morphs into chocolate and the mouthfeel is pretty dry. But that doesn't save this brew as the feeling of burnt coffee remains throughout the pint. Oh well.
Add flour, baking powder, and salt to a small bowl. Stir well with a wire whisk. Add flour mixture and milk alternately to butter mixture. Add vanilla. Gently stir in strawberries or blueberries or chocolate chips, or whatever you wish.
I had never thought that at the last hour (3-4pm) of the sit-in the situation would turn ugly. I was at the Masjid Jamek area and mostly the atmosphere was carnival in nature with people from all walks of society, especially the younger ones, singing the national anthem and other tunes as well chanting Bersih most of the time. There were balloons and placards to lend colour to the gathering.
Throughout the course of The Girls lives, anytime Lester heard the sound of them crying, he howled like a banshee. Having 3 daughters in the house, you can imagine the amount of crying we witnessed…daily. Lester’s “sympathy” was a running joke among friends and family members. Inevitably, I would be on the phone talking to someone, a sibling rivalry would break out, causing an injury, and one or more of The Girls would cry. Lester would instantaneously begin making a sound that can only be described as shrill and eardrum splitting. “EYE, EYE, EYE, EYE..,” he would howl! In the midst of it all, the doorbell might ring, just because God thought it would add to the chaos and be damn funny. I swore I was going to get it all on video someday, but I couldn’t ever manage to diffuse all the problems and get everyone calmed down while handling a recording device. Go figure.
She’s never happy, I can tell you that. She always has an argument even if it’s pretty lame. Then she resigns herself to the fact it’s about to happen and she goes with me to our place as if she’s walking to the guillotine
This game had to be one of the best I have ever seen. In fact, I have to use my
And there were some other points I was going to make on the video and peoples’ comments, but I have now forgotten what they were. Sorry, I’m a really bad scatterbrain, it was hard enough to write the above without going off on too much of a tangent.
My knowledge of the mechanics of my tricycle is limited but even I could guess that the most likely cause is the bearings have worn in what I think might be called the pedal shaft . Well, something like that.
You are the most important part of your health. Period. End of story.
I don't quite think there is there is there is anything to say. I won't talk about how much he will be missed or about his short but spectacular history from Isabella to Givenchy to the McQueen decade. Instead I will just say what McQueen meant to me.
As local election results funnel through SOE's servers (typically before they reach the public elsewhere), those who run the computer servers for SOE essentially get "first look" at results and the ability to immediately and privately examine vote details throughout the USA.
The robbed that smiles, steals something from the thief. ~William Shakespeare, Othello
emotion. Her words were not playful or threatening, but I recoiled, taking her very presence before me as threatening. I said nothing. “Good,” she continued. “Your silence suits you. You’ve said and done too much already.”
I knit this scarf for a friend of mine using Noro Aya yarn.
I have an explanation why I smell like DEET in the middle of winter.
My third novel Helm actually has a bunch of aikido in it, but it was written after I'd been practicing only about 3 years. I was much more interested in talking about the actual techniques, then. Now I'm more interested in talking about dojo culture and the relationship between teacher and student.
08 Sugar, Sugar (Barry, Kim) 5:15
4. Died Pretty "From a Buick 6" 4:11
Each of the girls has embarked on solo careers since announcing a hiatus in 2009. Sarah and Kimberley have turned to acting whilst Cheryl has been successful with her solo singing career and is working on her third studio album. She also appeared on three series of X Factor to mentor a group of contestants on the show and became the winning judge twice with Alexander Burke and Joe McElderry. Nicola has released her debut album Cinderella Eyes. Nadine has also embarked her own solo singing career too.
So since that time I have a full check up every year and every three years I let some surgeon take a magical mystery tour through my colon----my father had two bouts of colon cancer and my brother died of secondary cancers to an advanced colon cancer.
Brown boards with Gilt titling to the Spine.
Draw perpendiculars from the points A, I, J, C, E and G and mark the points on them such that
Dr. Rostron first examined the Cancer Control Supplement of the 1987 National Health Interview Survey. Of 6,073 current smokers, 1,417 reported that they smoked menthol cigarettes and 3,690 were nonmenthol smokers (the menthol preference for the other 966 smokers was undetermined). Using a computerized mortality file developed specifically for these survey participants, Dr. Rostron then determined how many smokers died from lung cancer over the next 20 years, through 2006. Comparisons were made using hazard ratios (HRs), which can be interpreted similarly to relative risks.
The envelope liner was a little more challenging since the card and envelope weren't a standard size. However I watched Gina's video and modified.
These malty sweet offerings tend to be a favorite winter seasonal. Big malt presence, both in flavor and body. The color ranges from brownish-reds to nearly pitch black. Hop bitterness is generally low, leveled and balanced, but hop character can be pronounced. Alcohol warmth is not uncommon. Many English versions contain no spices, though some brewers of spiced winter seasonal ales will slap "Winter Warmer" on the label. Those that are spiced, tend to follow the "wassail" tradition of blending robust ales with mixed spices, before hops became the chief "spice" in beer. American varieties may have a larger presence of hops both in bitterness and flavor.
I have brought a couple of April books into May to finish which gives me 11 or so books scheduled to read for review in May.
Children on the spectrum are notoriously picky about food.
Although Applejack is truly orange, the bricks are a kind of orange. I saw a story about a bio-mechanical canine.
Adding loose leave teas and herbs to your life can be a great hope and goal for 2012. It will add countless health and wellness to your life without much effort. It will also help you avoid caffeine, sugars and other troublesome foods. Just reach for a cup of goodness and serve it up with a cinnamon stick, hemp milk and stevia. Or if you prefer a TB of raw honey or splash of lemon too. And don't forget to sit, take deep breaths and enjoy it too. I know that is one of my goals for this year!
This place is too cool for a website. It’s a tiny tiny store that sells guitars, basses, ukeleles, and more. Also, don’t be surprised if while browsing you have to dodge around someone in the midst of a lesson. Luckily, they’ve set up a space outside where you can test things out and have impromptu jams like the one pictured above. This is a real local spot and according to my jam partner a frequent stop of many rockers (like Mike McCready) who call Orange County home.
That leaves a good chunk more for all of you out-of-town hipsters to strap on your arm. You'll be able to get one for $180 dollars when you show up.
I was a late bloomer in the cooking. My mom is an awesome cook, always very good at making due with what was in the fridge and being creative. My sister is an awesome baker! But in college something started to change.
Our Christian faith activates our spiritual natures but Ideology is a secular religion which replaces national religion and having no spiritual content gives rise to earthly fanaticism. It has nothing transcendent only a forced move towards utopia on earth instead of heaven. This developed from the French Enlightenment: one of the most significant events in human history that changed the human focus from looking back to the past for wisdom, the Bible, Aristotle and Plato, say, to working towards a vague, future utopia. It requires an idea of the person as abstract and malleable, with substance removed conceptually to fit them into a mental blueprint for utopia - Marxism's classless society, the feminists’ androgynous society, the liberal brotherhood of man and the Nazis' thousand year Reich of pure Aryans. The present Utopia is the coffee coloured, Multi-Racial society. Norman Pannell urged a practical approach to immigration at the 1958 and 1961 Conservative conferences suggesting immigrants have health checks and those who are criminal be deported; Colonial Secretary Iain Macleod countered at a fringe meeting with his utopian belief in the brotherhood of man.
It was the communist conspiracy to overthrow the SA government of the day via violent revolution that eventually brought Mandela (on a CIA tip-off) into the Pretoria Supreme Court as Accused No 1 in the Rivonia trial. The chief prosecutor, Dr Percy Yutar, produced ten documents, all in Mandela's own writing. These presented some pretty arresting statements and concepts: in particular, his preference for communism.
Darren White - Vocals
Serve this with tea.
Right. They were all characters played by actor Jason Statham in some of his signature action films. Chelios was the lead character in the Crank films, Martin was the lead in Transporter series, and Connors was another of the Statham tough-guy characters in the film Chaos.
To enter, leave a comment in this post. ONE comment per person. No anonymous comments will be accepted. So if you don't have a Google screen name, please put your name in the comment.
You don’t need to protect me
On the contrary I believe in the power of music and how music itself makes me feel, all the emotions attached to it, the power it has to make me feel in a certain way, regardless of the physical or personal “qualities” of who is writing it.
In the bowl of an electric mixer fitted with the flat beater, beat the butter on medium speed until smooth and creamy, 30 to 45 seconds. Reduce the speed to low, add the brown sugar and beat until blended. Increase the speed to medium and continue beating until the mixture is light and fluffy, about 5 minutes, stopping the mixer occasionally to scrape down the sides of the bowl. Add the eggs a little at a time, beating until incorporated before adding more and stopping the mixer occasionally to scrape down the sides of the bowl. Beat in the vanilla until incorporated, about 1 minute.
Indicate a sort of apathy, which so beguiles
What to do: Finely grate one small potato. Mush grated potato together with 1/8 of a cup of unsweetened applesauce until well blended. Lay down. (At some point, I am going to get you to relax and lay down, so you might as well just do it.) Pat mixture under eyes. Place hot towel (not too hot) over eyes and take a 5 minute snooze. Gently wash off with warm water.
2) Invest in some recording software and a mic and start recording my own voice – both singing and reading aloud
Anthony proposed to Catrina in their apartment. He held the ring out to her, and said, "I wanted to ask you when you thought you looked the worst because that is when I think you look the best." (Awww! I thought that was seriously adorable!) and she kissed him.
My bathroom maybe smells like a chemical lab at this juncture.
its own right. Featuring all-original songs (virtually every band member contributing to the writing chores), the self-titled album bounces all over the musical spectrum. Lead singers Bernie Schwartz and Barbara Wallace are both quite good, navigating through the different genres without any trouble. Highlights include the opening rocker Ain't No Good No More, Let Me Through, and the sweet ballad I'll See You.
+100 MaxHP/MaxMP, +62 Weapon ATT, +95 Magic ATT, +10 Avoidability, 7 slots. Bonus for levels 100+: +9 Weapon ATT, +20 Magic ATT.
If you’d have a life of joy,
We had a blast together as a family. We loved every second spending time together and I think we all needed a friendly reminder that we actually like each other. :) Sometimes our hectic life allows us to forget that minor detail. The plane rides aside, Kellen smiled the entire time....and while Hank didn't have an hour to spare, I'm sure glad he figured out a way to take a few days off to spend with us. After all, we're pretty fun.
Row 15: Knit 1 stitch, knit 2 stitches together, knit 1 stitch, purl into the back of the next stitch, knit 1 stitch, knit 2 stitches together, knit 1 stitch. (7 stitches)
“Alright, I get it. I’ll zip the lip.”
This is an idea I really like because it has the potential to make use of my favorite character kindred, humans, in a major way. The majority of the players will obviously need to be human (2/3 or 3/4). There could be hobbs or leprechauns as well, but a player choosing one of these kin would need to have a good explanation as to how they came into the service of the wizard. Elves and dwarves are out; these are just two of the alien beings that inhabit Trollworld. The characters will eventually encounter these kindred and will likely be at odds with them as they try to carve out a new territory. This campaign could also make good use of my revised citizen type. After all, a colonizing force needs more than warriors and wizard. Specialists of all types will be required to conquer the new world and the players will be forced to use more than swords and spells.
- Diagram offensive and defensive strategies for sports
For me, in town because of the Sommerakademie residency, every night is a social function of some sort with artists, curators and academics from around the world. People like to say how awful such things are. And receptions are indeed socially awkward but I also think they are great fun. And honestly, as an eager young artist, it’s quite exciting. It’s always fun because what starts as passed champagne and a few speeches always leads to a dinner that ends up a low-key dance party. Maybe Pipilotti Rist is on the dance floor shaking her bottom like a feisty child. And then later maybe Jan Verwoert ends the night playing his Sponge Bob guitar and singing “There Is A Light That Will Never Go Out.” After the annual dinner that marks the finale of the Sommerakademie, evening becomes night and a group of people winding around the quiet downtown looking for a bar open past 1am.
ObamaCare costs are soaring out of control after all of Obama’s lying promises. And now he’s walking away from this “baby” like a daddy who had his fun but has to move on to another momma to use and abuse and leave high and dry.
6. Tell us how long have you been blogging. I started blogging about a year and a half ago. It just started out as a hobby once in awhile, but soon I was playing along with some card challenges and it grew into an addiction! I started blogging the same time I started stamping and feel so blessed to have made such wonderful friendships with so many people in blogland!
Next thing is the color. The immediate go-to is black and I advise against this. I fall into the Italian mindset that black shoes are only appropriate for a wedding or a funeral. Unless you need some patent-leather to go with your tux, you can always wear a dark brown. Brown shoes will look great with the blue or grey suit you wore and they will add variety and color that will make you stand out in a dignified way. The go-to-hell colors can be saved for your socks or casual shoes. I recommend a dark brown or something like a cognac.
Have a fantastic day whatever you are doing. Enjoy your crafting and above all stay safe and healthy.
I headed to my local Walmart to find some cheap canvas shoes (The kids shoes were $5). Luckily, I snagged the last pair in any of my kids sizes and headed home to work. With the help of my Cropidile (which punches canvas beautifully), felt, hot glue and some thread, I transforned a very plain pair of canvas shoes into a pair my daughter loves to wear. (For a step by step instructions, you can check out my tutorial HERE.)
The card is made out of clear cardstock (which made it a chore to try to get a good photo of, so I apologize for the glare!) I used the SRM stickers from the "We've Got Your Border - Thanks", which work perfectly for a clear card base since they are also clear, to put together the inside of the frame and add some strips of coordinating twine as highlights.
I don’t agree that Tennant’s Doctor is becoming irritating, though – in context of the whole series, he’s not been short on confidence (after all, why should he be?), and I personally found the arrogant comments funny.
Laura from Simply Scraps was nice enough to let me play with her new collab with Scraps By Shilo. It's called Bots of Love. My DH was so excited that I made a layout that refered to Kristin and video games.
Dog eared pages with curled edges
While scientists had predicted that the next flip would begin from May 2013, the solar observation satellite Hinode found that the north pole of the sun had started flipping about a year earlier than expected. There was no noticeable change in the south pole.
An all star cast. The plot was a bit far fetched at times and they missed the opportunity to have an amazing action movie but it was good fun. There were great comic lines and it had some of my favourite actors including Northern Irish born Ray Stevenson. Seeing Orlando Bloom in a 'baddie' role is almost enough for anyone to sit through it, even if it's for all the wrong reasons.
because you were able to jump in and save the life of another
I also remember the '86 Mets. And the '04 Cardinals.
Cliff appeared on Jimmy Fallon last night where backed by The Roots he performed his classic cut 'The Harder They Come' and 'World Upside Down'.
Tolling for the deaf an’ blind, tolling for the mute
I've already gone into detail about the 'stripping back' process of turning a cliched phrase into something with real meaning. But what we didn't discuss was the tricky issue of the cliches hidden deeper in your work. Because cliches aren't just bland, meaningless phrases that disconnect the reader from the brilliance and emotional intensity of your ideas. Cliches can also get between you and your ideas.
Wednesday morning, with other members of EU Subcommittee F, to the Serious Organised Crime Agency in Vauxhall for a briefing on their work, and particularly the treatment of Suspicious Activity Reports, the mechanism used in compliance with European law to detect money laundering and terrorist offences. Their database contains 1.38 million records, which are retained for a maximum of six years, and are accessible to specialists in the law enforcement agencies under strict conditions. The ability of the software to rapidly identify links n=between SARS and to display them visually is an effective tool, and it was good to hear about an effective large IT system that is delivering results.
Getting There:
Interpublic Staffer Files $50M Discrimination Suit Against Holding Company
I always look forward to receiving these letters from past students.
In the last week, Spoil sold 64 copies on Amazon US, about 1/3 of what it sold the week it came off free. Still, it's maintaining a decent rank. This morning it was at:
Two years ago this month I participated in a mural project created and executed by my friend, colleague and personal hero, Robin Corbo. Painted on the side of a carpeting warehouse on busy Interstate Boulevard in Portland, Oregon, the mural serves to represent various Portland communities and celebrates the women who went above and beyond to help further equality within their respective neighborhoods, ethnic groups or human rights organizations.
Within moments of feeling stressed, your body begins the protocols of “fight or flight”. I’m sure you’ve heard of it. In the days of the cavemen, when we were faced with a foe, our bodies automatically begin to prepare to either fight the beast or run like hell. It saved us from life-threatening situations. Now those work deadlines are interpreted in the same way and our bodies prepares for battle. First, your body triggers a release of cortisol, which also happens to be a hormone that is tied to weight gain. Your body will also release a surge of adrenaline into the bloodstream which pumps up our muscles and allows us to run longer and faster. Think of hulking out in a less green and brutish fashion. When your stress response is in full gear your senses become heightened, you can focus and think more clearly, and be prepared to react to whatever comes your way.
Lots of sweat and tears in between.
God’s people come alive: Repentance and restitution, faith, hope, and love, joy and peace, praise and prayer, conscious communion with Christ, confident certainty of salvation, uninhibited boldness of testimony, readiness to share, and a spontaneous reaching out to all in need become their characteristic marks. There is a new forthrightness of utterance, expressing a new clarity of vision with respect to good and evil; and a new energy for reformation – personal, ecclesiastical, and social – goes along with it. While all this is happening, outsiders come in, drawn by the moral and spiritual magnetism of what goes on in the church. (p.195)
Torn Natalie Imbruglia
Over the past year the wood table top has gradually shrunk and separated and has gotten to the stage where it looks horrendous!
He: Of course! Over and over!
A bit later in the same text: “The message in the present instance is not “the pose” but “Kennedy praying”: the reader receives as a simple denotation what is in actual fact a double structure – denoted-connoted.”/Page 22.
1 autumn
Inside they found all the other guests laughing and joking around with one another as they held their complimentary glasses filled with one of the four beers that were being tried for the first time today. Most glasses were filled with Russian Imperial Stout, as it seemed to be the preferred beer of the day. Other more adventurous guests shared glasses of Uberliner and 15th Anniversary Ale, while all the fruit-lovers in the Publick House were drawn to the Black Raspberry Lambic.
And get myself down a system for taking 3 tots to the toilet in public. Tried it once & it was a bit of a disaster. Finally got taking Liv potty on the go mastered, now I have a different method to tackle. But like everything with parenting, you figure out your way of doing it eventually. Right?
The circumstances by which the United States came to occupy Guantánamo are as troubling as its past decade of activity there. In April 1898, American forces intervened in Cuba’s three-year-old struggle for independence when it was all but won, thus transforming the Cuban War of Independence into what Americans are still wont to call the Spanish-American War. American officials then excluded the Cuban Army from the armistice and denied Cuba a seat at the Paris peace conference. “There is so much natural anger and grief throughout the island,” the Cuban general Máximo Gómez remarked in January 1899, after the peace treaty was signed, “that the people haven’t really been able to celebrate the triumph of the end of their former rulers’ power.”
64. I hate dandelions! Hoping the spray we put on the yard tonight will work!!
Hello world. Yes, we are still alive and I do promise to quit starting off every blog post by apologizing and offering lame excuses for my absence…but not today. I’ve been busy! My work has been crazy busy but seems to have settled down some now. A whole week in the office feels like such a luxury. Anyway, I’ve been working away at work and then coming home and working away there (two small children, a husband, dog and house to keep semi-sanitary is not easy) and then running 3 out of 5 nights a week so, by the time all of that is done…I crash. It was so bad that I’d stop in the middle of the day and figure out how many hours until I could get in the bed again.
Now, two weeks later, I returned. (Still no word from the pastor, or the church–forwarded my original message to the church’s email address, hoping to connect with someone there.) The same gentleman came and asked to sit next to me. I had already had alarm bells going off. He is very nice, and seems kind enough, but my gut wrenches at the thought that just “being divorced” is enough in common to build a friendship, much less a relationship, on. His approach and demeanor suggested that he does not agree. Nothing like the damsel in distress syndrome either. As broken and alone as I am, no relationship will heal the pain of my current circumstances–only complicate them. While the pain at times seems unbearable, and friends can seem hard to come by–or at least, hard to connect with in any healthy way in my state of grief–trying to mask the pain and brokenness in any warmth a relationship might offer, will have long term consequences, both for me and my children. It can take everything I have just to get out of bed in the morning and face the day. I am in no state to enter any kind of relationship that will have future ramifications, as all relationships do. Harder to come by, though they may be, I need women right now. Safety. Without the potential of redirecting my entire future before I even know what I’ve done.
Every suggestion I have beyond this one is null and void if your family is not actively engaged with the Word of God. God’s inspired Word is where our view of the world should come from. Sound doctrine and theology are essential to living for Christ. Since He’s given us His inspired Word, let’s not neglect it.
The Baba Yaga took a drink of cider, her brow furrowed. "We'll get her after you eat, how about that? Daniel, would you like to speak with her alone before she meets with the girls?" Her tone seemed laced with meaning, and Sam's father nodded, seemingly catching the unspoken message.
Barring an introductory shot of an ancient Fremont pictogram and a super-slow-motion depiction of a shuttle launch, the first fifteen minutes of Koyaanisqatsi consist almost entirely of desert vistas, filmed in astonishing panorama with Fricke's peerless attention to detail. The exquisite beauty of such Southwestern landmarks as Monument Valley and the Grand Canyon is conveyed with nothing short of reverence, and is accompanied by an in-flight adagio for woodwinds and brass courtesy of Glass. Apart from the sheer splendor of the locations, the most visually arresting aspect of this passage derives from the time-lapse photography utilized to capture images of cloud formations brewing into existence and racing across the sky. This footage is complemented by slow-motion studies of oceanic tides, gigantic waves crashing upon each other before returning to the swell. The parallel between the sky and the sea is obvious, their similarities made explicit through cross-cutting.
The place of expedition
Crab Cakes – Wonderful! Served with an adorable tiny fork and fantastic dill sauce.
I was confident that nothing would or could go wrong.
So now, time to find a job, and start a new journey.
Except that we don’t. And, in fact, often we can’t get it. Purely because we ourselves have our own culture (whatever that may be) we can’t grasp how different cultures are different. Because culture isn’t in the food you eat or the clothes you wear, it’s in how you think and how you view the world.
~ Irish Blessing
et Voila! You have your own personal skirt block which can be customised in various ways to make virtually any skirt you can think of!
7. Blue Bell Mint Chocolate Chip Ice Cream
Invincible by Crossfade
The Congos - Ark Of The Covenant
Since the publication of J. L Martyn’s groundbreaking work, History and Theology in the Fourth Gospel (1968),[1] Johannine scholars have relied heavily upon the thesis that John’s Gospel provides a two-level story concerned with Jesus and with the struggles of the Johannine community. In other words, the conflicts and concerns of John’s community have been read back into the life of Jesus with the result that the two stories have become intertwined. There is not space here to critique Martyn’s proposal or rehearse the history of its reception among scholars. Suffice it to say that, while some of his original thesis has been qualified or discarded, many scholars still operate under the basic assumption that the Fourth Gospel tells the interrelated stories of Jesus and the Johannine community. Scholars commonly agree that the Gospel’s three references to believers being expelled from the synagogue (9:22; 12:42; 16:2) represent evidence of a conflict within the Johannine community. Since Christ followers were not being expelled from the synagogue during Jesus’ lifetime, this appears to represent a concern for John’s religious community. Among scholars, this element of the narrative remains one key to locating the struggles of John’s community in the Gospel story.
2. Hydrating in the winter is difficult: This has been an ongoing theme during my training. When its cold outside, I certainly don’t notice the sweat as much, and although I try, I typically still don’t drink enough. I did better this weekend, but I’m still learning.
Preheat the oven to 200 degrees. Slice the tops off of the peppers, cut out the seeds and pull out any white membrane. Stuff the peppers with the risotto (or whatever you are using), top with the crumbled feta and sprinkle with oregano. Put the peppers in a foil lined baking tin with the unpeeled garlic cloves. Sprinkle the breadcrumbs over the feta and drizzle the tops & garlic with olive oil. Bake the peppers in the preheated oven for 35 – 40 minutes but take the garlic cloves out after 15 minutes.
He has just sat for the past 8 months in prison so knows that prison life isn’t all it’s cracked up to be, even in Norway where it sounds like home from home for him. His mother on lock down for 10 years with all sorts of criminal convicts and daily prison life isn’t going to be a very nice thought for him to mull over in his mind and he has had to do it for 8 months.
“Hij staat goed aangeschreven” or “to be in a person’s good books” can for example been tracked to Exodus 32:32 and “Zie niet aan, wat voor ogen is” to 1 Samuel 16:7 “for man looketh on the outward appearance, but Jehovah looketh on the heart.” or “zonder aanziens” “without fear or favour” from Romans 2:11, Deuteronomy 10:17 and Matthew 22:16: “For there is no acceptance of faces with God,” (Romans 2:11 YLT); “For Jehovah your God, he is God of gods, and Lord of lords, the great God, the mighty, and the terrible, who regardeth not persons, nor taketh reward.” (Deuteronomy 10:17 ASV); “… for thou regardest not the person of men.” (Matthew 22:16 ASV).
I looked at my guide who was standing back watching all of this unfold. I didn’t have to say a word to him. He knew by the look in my eyes.
01/24/2011 BUY 0.02 xauusd 1333.580
“The prospect of cheap fusion energy is the worst thing that could happen to the planet.”
It might have looked as if I’ve gone to ground, lost interest in this blogging lark….
Quiz on chapters 1-8 of Black Boy.
3. You really should have a cheeseburger at Casino El Camino. I just had one, for the first time, even though that club's been around for like 10 years. Frig, it was fantastic. I recommend the blue cheese with buffalo sauce.
This abomination, on the other hand, so astonishing; one more time, Dr. Aregone thought. “Go on to Building H,” he said reluctantly.
embossing (dry or heat)
Red yarn for the apple
“Yes, of course,” Bernie said stroking the long grey tassels of his mustache. “You’ll feel better once you know she is safe.”
So, I dare to be different, if only for a few minutes. I want all of that, the fussing and the holding and the cuddling, but I promise you, I WILL NOT call it love.
Blogging amidst all the kt literary jollification yesterday, I forgot to mention that Bobbie Pyron featured the dog Callie and me on her website. Very cute blog idea. Callie needed some good news, having spent much of the past three weeks in her Cone of Shame from her vet surgery.
Snuggle with the ones you love....
* Fridge
What a wonderfully creative week it has been. You have wowed us once again with your amazing creations. The variety is just awesome! No shortage of inspiration to be found here at MIM that is for sure!
and mine (Delys) ...a Heritage/Vintage LO of my Grandparents. Ruffled edges/patchwork style is often a vintage style. Embossed cardstock and lacy edges complete the look.
Laughter is the best.
I am so happy I fell into the panel & have 3 new people I can nerd out over!:-)
Once on board (to my fellow passengers: sorry about the smell), the train speeds across the New Forest, and, as the sun disappears below a heathland horizon, I catch a glimpse of a group of four fallow deer – a final treat, and a perfect end to the day.
Can this be rectified by making a bigger claim (say for enhanced damages or aggravated damages – or publication of an apology) and then offering to settle for less? There would seem to be no reason why not – but more on that in a moment.
and that God forgives those who suffer so much.
The marchers made their way on towards Whitehall. Because numbers were so much higher than expected the stewards arranged with the police to break the crowd down into three groups. No fuss, no problems, not threats or aggression.
Apparently some more people arrived after that so although I don't think the magic number of 30 (the sort of "break even" number for ANT for such events), 16+ people were added which hopefully means 16 or so lives potentially saved somewhere in the world - you are heroes all of you!
Recap:
I left a little one with a short note, asking to light the candle and enjoy the evening, knowing that "the person" is someone special.
and tell terrors and profits and loves--curses of men
We bought you a new bouncy seat that you seem to like. You don't care for swings so when we aren't holding you we have been putting you in your bouncy seat or on your playmat. Unfortunately though you dont last longer than 15 minutes in either before you start crying. You still love to be held by your momma!
In tracing the origins of the on-going destruction of women in the Congo, these two bureaucrats point to its "ground zero" of origination: “Certainly, partly due to women’s low legal status in both the traditional and civil domains, rape existed in the eastern provinces before the Rwandan genocide exodus in 1994 and the civil wars of 1996 and 1998. However, most of those cases reportedly took the form of the rape of a girl by a male ‘admirer’ when she went to gather firewood or collect water, for example; the issue was resolved between families by marrying the two, or by requiring the perpetrator to pay restitution to the girl’s family in the form of one or two goats. The extremely high number of cases of rape and the horrific mutilations that began to be reported from 1996 on, however, appears to replicate the massive sexual violence documented in Rwanda during the Rwandan genocide.”
Given the 9-11 attacks, the Fort Hood shootings, 14 million unemployed Americans, an 9% unemployment rate, chronic underemployment, almost $15 TRILLION in national debt, high taxes, and low economic growth, I hate to see how bad things would be if our politicians did not have this flexibility.
My personal favourite was the Balvenie DoubleWood 12yr due to its sweetness and blend of raisin and cinnamon on the palate.
is causing death or the loss of life, then the same principle would apply with the same strength to pulling weeds out of a garden. If it is not immoral to weed a garden, then life as such cannot really be sacred, and killing as such cannot be morally wrong.”
I've been eating mostly grain-free the last month or two. Ever since I had the lung damage I have found I feel better the less grain I eat. I used to eat A LOT of grain, and have drastically reduced that (and what I did eat was almost always prepared according to the Weston A Price guidelines) but decided it was time to cut it out all together. I've eaten a sandwich or two when out during that time, but not eating any grain in an average day or week. At first it was challenging (what do I take for lunch if I can't make a sandwich? what do I have for a snack?) but after a little time went by it became much simpler and I very quickly quit wishing I could have some. I've found that not only do I feel healthier but I feel way less hungry and almost never need a snack and I absolutely never crave sugar anymore. If I have to wait a little too long between meals due to work or etc. I don't start feeling bad like I used to sometimes. Also I didn't used to eat a lot of sugar since I was ill, but I would still crave it and now I never do. My body is happier. I'm still eating potatoes frequently and other starchy vegetables so it isn't really low-carb nutrition (like GAPS or Paleo or some of the other interesting nutritional systems I have leaned about and borrowed recipes and ideas from in just the last couple months), just no grain.
- Peng Zhen
Chris Parker took over and gave an overview of GeoVation, which aims to help overcome community challenges through the use of geography. He started by saying "Everything happens somewhere." (I think that's broadly very true, although I do wonder about white collar crime which doesn't ever seem to happen anywhere specific).
Nothing shiny today, only a picture of two trees, taken some time ago, which reminds me of a very special quote of a really amazing movie. This citation means a lot to me…“End?
The industry, led by Time Warner Cable, wants to protect itself from what it calls unfair competition. The industry’s concerns are gaining urgency as some two dozen towns in the state are either planning or exploring their own telecommunications and television service for residents and businesses.
Wall of State-directed hate against Afrikaners:
For the followers of Christ there is no middle ground. We’re either actively engaged in bringing the reality of God’s Kingdom to light amid the cultural contexts of our lives, or we’re allowing those cultural contexts to dim or obscure the light of Christ. Either the light of Christ in us is shining in the culture, or the bushel basket of the culture is turned upside-down over our heads.
I will probably spend the night on the patio and then bring Dod back downhill to El Chaco for the super bowl party. We have about 20 people entering our pool for the super bowl. The menu includes barbecue shrimp, Spanish fried rice, tostados, bean dip and roasted veggies. The shrimp have been ordered from a local fisherman who launches his boat right from our beach. Two kilos (4.4 lbs.) will cost around 350 pesos or $6. per pound for jumbo shrimp already cleaned.
The years immediately after 1695 saw a growing number of Catholics converting to Protestantism, particularly amongst the upper and middle classes. The Earl of Drogheda, a member of the Protestant Ascendancy, was rather alarmed by this and began to panic that if too many Catholics converted, the aristocracy would run out of servants. In 1707, the victorious Ascendancy, all of them members of the Church of Ireland, extended the Penal Laws to apply to Irish Presbyterians, too. There had been a massive influx of Presbyterian immigration into Ulster from Scotland in the 1690s and early 1700s and the Ascendancy were keen to ensure they remained in control, rather than the new immigrants. Some members of the Ascendancy were so suspicious of Presbyterians, who had a reputation for political radicalism, that they claimed ‘they are more to be feared than the Catholics themselves.’ Not all of the Penal Laws’ awful codes were applied to the Presbyterians like they were to the Catholics, but Presbyterians were still banned from voting, sitting in
24. The Whole Of The Moon
“If you must choose between loving someone and acting so that they feel loved, always choose to love them.”
4.Laura Henton / I Can Tell The World About This
I was moved by my friend Amy’s reply: “You’re the one I’m looking at right now.”
emphasis was placed on their 1968 “Anthem of the Sun” release,
Magic City Stomp by Lee Bains & The Glory Fires
Needless to say, by this point the idea of Mr A having a balcony was fairly abhorrent to all, and we were itching to get him to provide his plans for us to "nay" them unanimously...but the plans never appeared.
This does not happen every time but if it happens just once, you will appreciate it.
Brandon Marshall Scores 4 TDs AFC Takes Pro Bowl: Brandon Marshall caught six passes for 176 yards and a Pro Bowl-record four touchdowns and the AFC used a second-half surge to beat the NFC, 59-41, today.
I notice no one's criticising Jennifer's extremely well muscled, well nourished looking male co-stars. It's fine for them to look as if they've been eating enough to keep alive. Apparently it's only female actors who have to bow to 'realism' to such an extent that they should look gaunt, bony and as if trying to draw a bow would snap them in half.
In short he is telling me that my tax $$$$$$ need to continue to pay a man who cyah do the wuk!!!!
That, however, presupposes that Plato was a supporter of democracy, and, in particular, its Athenian incarnation. Nothing could be further from the truth: Plato's entire oeuvre is clearly anti-democratic in character; in the Republic, democracy is the second-to-worst political system, one step above tyranny, the worst.
Lessons learned: Stances! It was too easy, as I got tired, to get into zenkutsu dachi or shiko instead of the smaller (and more efficient in my mind) kendo/iaido stances. Karate stances do not mix well with sword techniques.
Me: Yes, I suppose it is.
I am sorry it has taken me so long in between posts. I have been shopping up a storm, and making over a fireplace for my bedroom. I just need to find my battery charger plug for my camera and I will be all ready to go.
*Become a fan of Illustrated Ink on Facebook for one entry (I'm also having a separate giveaway on Facebook for a print!)
Most individuals at present will already know about web courting, this is certainly one of the most used things online at present but how can it actually help a single individual? Well, for a start, on-line courting can not simply give folks a option to date someone new but also find a new friend.
Butting heads
See also: pat buchanan.org. November 1998; and "Death of the West” 2002.(St.Martins Press); “"State of Emergency” (2006.St.Martins Press)
A friend of mine offered up an extra complimentary ticket to see theater legend Linda Lavin in this new comedy playing at a theater right around the block from the Wall Street Journal office; having come across generally positive press for it, I raised my hand, so to speak, first and ended up being that friend's +1.
Hey everyone *waves*
I love this book because it's a children's book that doesn't read like one. Yes, Carroll wrote it for a 7 year old girl (who starts as the main character), but Alice goes through some seriously traumatic experiences that take on a whole new perspective when an adult reads it. Some of the characters and places she encounters are outright nightmarish (and no, contrary to popular belief, there is no evidence to suggest that Carroll was a drug addict). Alice is also constantly pressured to identify herself, but she can't. She thinks she knows who she is, but quickly learns that she doesn't, and it's absolutely frustrating and terrifying to navigate an unfamiliar world. Eventually she is forced to figure it out and find her way... aren't we all?
Anyway, Duane says I should blog about the company when I finally, if ever get the yarn. But I've read in places not to give a bad review as that is someone's lively hood. What to do?
After the mass de-virgining, the rules were recited (#1: Don't fuck with the hair!) and the screening began.
Alison Bickford – Alison is an e-learning consultant with loads of experience in the government and corporate sectors. She extends her consulting wisdom via the Connect Thinking blog and helps other e-learning professionals via the E-Learning Academy.
Other more subtle effects have also been added, including redone matte backgrounds of planets which now feature a little more movement and seem a bit more realistic, but without gushing over into Lucas’ “Tatooine” sequence.
At 4:45 my friend that has night class on Mondays with me (different class, same times) wanted to stop at Starbucks before. Of course I complied! Then, she bought me a latte and an oatmeal cookie! I wish I had taken a picture. It was so sweet! :)
We sat down, and started talking. And we talked. And talked. And talked some MORE. It was... wonderful. We talked about my job, the blog, single adventures, and Robin told me about her family, and her recent return to higher education. She had a baby during her freshman year of college. A baby who is now a senior at My Small Town High School, and cringes every time I am giving a presentation and I tell the class a little too exuberantly that I saw him the day he was born.
You: So, you like Jesus?
W1:: We home school, so we do it during the day most of the time.
· Borders will continue to operate. As I explained on Monday, Chapter 11 bankruptcy doesn't necessarily entail liquidation. Although Borders plans to close many individual stores, the chain itself will still do business while under bankruptcy protection. This means you can still buy books there and, just as importantly, your books can still be carried there.
I posted a copy of the DVD my animation is on, for some reason, HAHA!
Said "Have you read Ken Bruen's Jack Taylor series?"
For supper we added some olives and mozzarella cheese to the sauce. Then we set out plates of quartered mushrooms, onion slices, a variety of toasted breads, sliced garlic bread, and lightly breaded and fried zucchinni sticks.
Thus it’s vanishingly rare to see any public discussion of historical events these days that doesn’t fixate, often to the extent of caricature, on distinguishing the good guys from the bad guys—and when this is attempted, the first reaction of a great many listeners or readers is to figure out how to cram what’s been said into that same simplistic moral dualism. While there’s a point to applying ethical philosophy to history (and vice versa), though, there are entire realms of understanding that can’t be reached so long as the center of discussion is who was right and who was wrong. Over the next few weeks, I plan on talking about the rise of America’s current empire as a historical phenomenon and not a morality play, and leave my readers free to make their own moral judgments if they find those useful.
What the hell is this stuff and do I need to make a panicky call to my doctor because I got my face too close to it?
National Orchid Garden Tour. (English Version) Singapore Botanic Gardens.
13. Made 15 trips to the hospital for immunoglobulin infusions. Yeah St. Louis University Hospital!
Have you ever made homemade bread? I used to use a breadmachine where you pretty much can't go wrong. But, have you noticed that when using a breadmachine that your loaf of bread is weird shaped? But, nonetheless, it was easy and it was yummy so I continued to use it. And eat HUGE, weird-shaped sandwiches!
Content until I invite someone over because I want to host. Because the Bible tells me to be hospitable. Because I want to come face to face with one of my weaknesses. Because it is an area that is not a strongsuit, but I am willing to improve.
So the frequencies have a best fit and now the best fit has words attached to them, so pattern matching patterns fits words together, and the machine then uses a ANN type method to output the best match from the list of possible matches.
I also adore this lipstick. Everyone always compliments it. Sometimes I find myself grabbing the reds more often than I'd like. But this green was just asking to be paired with a pretty pink lip!
Rain-cloud pour through
So, the euro clearly was at the centre of Europe’s economic troubles from 2008 onwards, but there were plenty of other reasons for Europe’s financial tempest.
Watermark and photo effects: Photographers Toolkit 3 by: Wallstorm
“Okay doctor, thank you!”
Here is a side view:
Its Unified Computing System has expanded to include “new Fabric Interconnects, a new Virtual Interface Card and a new chassis I/O module,” according to a press release. Cisco said the improvements increase bandwidth to the chassis and the server, while “doubling the switching capacity of the data center fabric.”
She also has a tiny leather flower I added to her headband with a brad.
Here we have their first album "Under The Scalpel Blade" from 1984 along with the songs from their split LP with Kafka Prosess "One Day Son All This Will Be Yourz" from 1986.
BUT, having said that, I’m getting tired of seeing/hearing people saying that “Big is beautiful”! It’s not! It’s not that is ugly either, but seriously, being over weight is NOT a good thing, sorry, but if you care about your health, if you want to be around for your kids, then you should take care of yourself!
Although one can hardly classify this maner of speech as a form of hate speech or propaganda, it has planted a mistaken perception in the minds of millions of people. Today people will automatically and subconsciously associate the old Police Force, for example, and anything that vaguely resembles that era (such as flags, logos, emblems, etc.) with ‘hatred’. I strongly believe that people have gone way overboard with this perception, as there were numerous police divisions in the old South African Police that followed the exact same ethical protocols and procedures, which were also adopted by other respectable police agencies worldwide.
What a glorious thought.
“When are you going to write something serious?” (You mean the ones that leave you feeling like you need Prozac?)
When Parīkṣit was in Kuru Jungle he heard not very desirable news: Kali had spread through his own jurisdictions. Then, with this excellent opportunity for a fight he took up his weapons.
Through the vast array of wonderful myths books available, the stories appear to be more prevalent to today’s children than when I was a child. The breadth of storylines and characters will, I’m sure, provide inspiration to authors, illustrators, games designers, musicians and film makers for generations to come.
We opted for black details, and based these changes off of a fabulous black metal piece we found at Home Sense about a year back. We also decided that we would incorporate some family photos into our home- a first for us. We aren't exactly "family photo" people, but we're going to try to expand our horizons.
Many firsts mark a new stage of independence. The first time they feed or dress themselves and the first time they spend the night away from you are all exciting events, yet often bittersweet. The child has risen to a challenge, passed a new milestone - and is growing ever closer to taking care of himself.
Phase 5 – Cardio
Armed with a new acoustic guitar purchased with earnings from his modeling work, Tyler immersed himself in the folk music of the time, especially the work of Bob Dylan, whose "Blowin' in the Wind" numbered among the several songs he chose for his next recording session, this time at Regent Studios. While no recording contracts materialized as a result, Tyler did receive an invite to record a test session for Columbia at Abbey Road Studios; however the legendary label was unimpressed. Nevertheless, Tyler, soon to metamorphose into Marc Bolan after releasing a one-off single, "The Wizard" on Decca, remained undeterred. Bolan: "I began to realise I had an ego that I wanted to satisfy. I was either going to be an actor, a poet or a musician in the end and I began to see that it would be a faster road to freedom of any sort, not financially but with the ability to sit in a flat and not have to do anything other than what I wanted to do, to be a musician." In 1967, after having spent several months in Paris, Bolan caught the attention of Yardbirds manager Simon Napier-Bell, who also managed a notorious band of misfits known as John's Children, famous for their onstage fisticuffs and anarchic stage act that often included donning fake blood and feathers, as well as destroying their instruments. When their guitarist was fired in early 1967, Napier-Bell decided to replace him with his newest client: Marc Bolan. While Bolan's time in John's Children would be brief (four months), he was around long enough to record his first great song, the single "Desdemona," which ended up being banned, quite ridiculously, by the BBC for the lyric, "Lift up your skirt and fly." Napier-Bell, eager to capitalize on the buzz surrounding the single, secured John's Children a spot supporting The Who on the latter's spring German tour. Not unpredictably, there were problems from the start: John's Children were received well by German concert-goers, but The Who, particularly their management, were not happy that the band's stage act was more outlandish than the headliners (who were also known to smash an instrument or two); for example, Bolan took to beating his guitar with a heavy chain while other band members staged fights that included smashing capsules of fake blood. Even worse, in Ludwigshafen, the antics of John's Children incited an audience riot, which resulted in the band being promptly fired from the tour.
Best Tike Tech City X3 Swivel Double Stroller – Autumn Orange — orange Collections
So here’s my problem: Just killing Tania isn’t going to be enough. Unless It takes out Tania AND Nikki and possibly Steve B (which would all be pretty damn hard to pull off here at the last minute, because we’re about to leave Planet #6 and go home), the Captain’s secret murderous side isn’t going to be a secret anymore, once they return to Earth.
Brown velvet jacket with attached brooch, FANG. Green silk-blend sweater, Laura Leigh Ltd. Striped skirt, George (thrifted). Brown boots, Nine West. Topaz drop necklace, gifted. Owl purse, World Market.
This promotion is in no way sponsored, endorsed or administered by, or associated with, Facebook, Twitter, Blogger or Pinterest. Your entries are going to Emergency Essentials and not to Facebook, twitter, blogger or Pinterest. Facebook, twitter, blogger or Pinterest is in no way responsible for any part of this giveaway.
When they finally reach Venus, they find Professor Hess is waiting for them. Fearing for the safety of The Boy Who Actually Saw a Women’s Breast, Sam decides to give the women Bodysuit instead. The story more or less ends here. We find out Sam takes The Boy back to Earth and raises him as his son while Professor Hess stays on Venus to help Bodysuit. **End Spoilers**
But really, the reason I believe in raising kids Free-Range is this: They only get one childhood, and childhood’s magic words are these: “I did it myself.”
There is nothing more chilling and terrifying than reading a true crime novel and thats just what Envy is. Filled with mystery, intrigue and murder you will be left on the edge of your seat throughout. If you want a really creepy book for Halloween Envy is a must read for you!
The book of the fair for me was sitting unobtrusively on a French stand, Albin-Michel. "Sick of Pink" said the poster, which caught my eye, but the book is called Marre du Rose in French and is by Nathalie Hense, illustrated by Ilya Green. It is a perfect story of a little girl who prefers to wear black and is teased for it. Act quickly British publishers; I've already enthused about it to two of you!
If he or she makes a grammatical error, for example, or leaves something out, you can focus on using the words properly yourself, but do not stop and make a lesson out of what your child just said.
I have a couple of things I need to finish up before I frantically start working on my guild's show quilt(s). My zigzag quilt is still on my design wall and I think it would be better to get it sewn together rather than take it all down. I also need to get my Christmas project done for January.I can see some early mornings and late nights ahead for me. I am linking to WIP Wedensday at the Needle and Thread and WiP Wednesday at Freshly Pieced.
Yet the Dundas Downtown Transportation Master Plan’s draft recommendations in October included a proposal to widen Governor’s Road.
This weekend was the kind that seemed to last for 2 weeks.
Ozone - The rooftop bar at the Ritz Carlton in West Kowloon is good for a quick drink with a 360 view of Hong Kong - but definitely lacks atmosphere.
At dinner, you get the same, with an extra main course to boot. The breads are homemade and addictive, and on any given day, the cheese cart offers 30 to 40 different types. Except for dessert, however, there are usually no choices: Gérard markets each morning and crafts the daily-changing menu from the ingredients he finds most appealing. But if you have special dietary concerns, he'll happily accommodate you...and the vegetarian at our table was thrilled with what Gérard prepared. ''If a dish is not for
Listen to your heart, fear not to fall,
The death He died, He died to sin. Your sin and my sin. His excruciating last moments have worked healing and restoration to all our many moments of epic failures.
1.) the crusts were clearly supermarket made. Blah to that!
At 27 Julia isn't ready to have children and her job is not required to cover birth control. This is just another segment of the imaginary war on women. If she is paying less on interest for her student loans, she could afford the $9 for the birth control pill. He also forgets to mention that her (and mine, for that matter) insurance rates are higher because of the "free" stuff she is getting. But she gets to think they are free.
8) Toshiba Notebook
she has always been there,
But the best part about it all has the fan mail. Even before the book, I’d get emails from young women who followed GILP and were inspired by the possibility of one day living in Paris or being a writer. There’s nothing better than receiving a message from a stranger, out of the blue, telling you that you’ve had an impact on their life. This past week, I received a note that actually made me cry. I won’t share all of it, just this bit that put a squeeze on my heart.
I should have known there was a problem with my image following my first televised appearance in about 1968. My Professor had been asked to make a programme about various forms of hair loss, and so I, as the bright young spark and general dogsbody of the Department, had been asked to gather together suitable patients and demonstrate the various features of their different diseases in the clinic, whilst my Professor spoke about the science of hair follicles from the studio.
Lynette recalls how she and Tom met and bought their house on Wisteria Lane. Her memories lead to the day Tom was moving out with the help of Mike. Mike tells Lynette she should be fighting for her marriage. So Lynette decides to fight.
*I made my mashed potatoes with buttermilk, butter, salt and pepper- ah ma goodness. Highly recommend that!
Pedro continued to tilt my head from side to side murmuring to himself in Spanish. I was still in shock from the snake suggestion and my nose kept twitching from some smell that I couldn't quite identify. "Do you smell something?" I asked.
I'm sure over time I'll continue to make changes here and there, especially with my bookcases. I'm still figuring out what storage solutions work best for me, but for now, it's just what I need."
Seat 7: Hero ($15.20 in chips)
Adventurous ... Is part of a para-military group.
“In being told the three "undisputed" facts, we are being told to forget that the Coleman Report quashed any sense of racism on the team; to forget that men on the team publicly stated their outrage over racist comments, if made, by their teammates; to forget that Devon Sherwood called those 46 men his brothers; to forget that the women on the lacrosse team - empowered, strong, intelligent women led by an empowered, strong, intelligent woman publicly wore their thoughts on their wrists about the innocence of three of those men.
O Blood and Water, which gushed forth from the Heart of Jesus as a fountain of Mercy for us, I trust in You!
Liese glanced around for something to do while he went about preparing the meal. She frowned, as her gaze zeroed in on the sofa.
I find this intensely frustrating, because it means that each time I want to go swimming outside, I have to carefully weigh up the pros and cons in the style of a complex maths equation. Is it worth the discomfort, or should I play it safe? During our stunning holiday to Spain several months ago, I went with the former. The consequences were always worth it to go snorkelling in the clear water, with a whole micro-system of multicoloured seaweed and shoals of fish like iron filings beneath my nose. Magical.
Fly fishing will be an exact sport that typically needs the fly to be presented to a fish with correct casting, for this reason the fly rod needs qualities that may preform the manner the fisher intends. The rod has to not solely gift a fly during a manner that imitates its prey however conjointly handle the upcoming battle, particularly massive fish in serious flowing waters.
I walked into the house, where Michael had been working on the basement. He took one look at me and said, "Oh! Okay."
I stared blankly. She stared back. A real mexican standoff in the middle of Albertsons. "I'll wait," I said. She picked up the phone and called for the manager over the loudspeaker.
Listed at $224,900 Fee Simple
Extreme Rules Match
(screams)
Suddenly I heard a strong fluttering noise above my head.
But, Lord, was he a good musician—an integral part of The Band, one of my all-time favorite groups. The Band was one of those groups, like Steely Dan, that was sui generis, with their own sound and unique type of song—country-ish in their case, but infinitely more sophisticated. They also starred in what I think was the best rock movie ever made, The Last Waltz. By all means see it on Blu-Ray if you can, and crank the volume up.
(For new readers: I went to the Republic of Georgia for spring break to visit Ernie, who teaches English there.)
A boner….
BOX OFFICE PERFORMANCE: $164.7M on a $60M production budget; the theatrical run was quite profitable.
ABC News reported on Monday that American and European officials feared al Qaeda may soon try to attack US-bound aircraft using explosives implanted in the bodies of militants. ABC reported that due to this concern, security had been stepped up at some British and European airports and some Federal Air Marshals may have been redeployed.
My girlfriend never wants to do stuff because she’s too tired. How is she always too tired? Shouldn’t she have to satisfy me more than just once every three months?
Guess what I'll be doing all summer??
$2.00 off TWO packages Kellogg's Crispix Cereals
wasn't for young ladies.
The Discovery / BBC quest to the actual ends of the Earth wraps up this week with a final, and somewhat controversial, episode focusing on climate change. It’s probably impossible to top Planet earth, but what we’ve seen of this nature documentary has put it above the recent Life series on our lists. Of course, another option is to snag the David Attenborough-narrated BBC version this week instead. Your choice.
Of the sixty some odd "charities" we looked at, the lowest paid
A pizza without cheese is like…(He says trying to think of something super intelligent & witty to compare it to)…well, to be perfectly frank, it’s a pizza without cheese. (Nope, move along! Nothing to see here!)
American writer Joseph C. Lincoln (1870-1944), who wrote a shelf full of books and plays about Cape Cod, said the Battle of Bunker Hill is inextricably bound up with New England clam chowder.
The VPO's commitment to its distinctive personnel policies goes back a long way, but only became a matter of discussion relatively recently. Until 1997, women were officially barred from membership in the orchestra (they could perform with the orchestra, but they couldn't join the official roster).
This will be my third and final post in my "paying forward", as I accept the Versatile Blogger Award.
This book is my third review submitted as part of Bev’s 2012 Vintage Mystery Readers Challenge specifically the ‘Golden Age Girls’ section – so far I have read the following, but am definitely open to suggestions:
Often a lustrous inner dawn shall come
One of the easiest ways to get over someone is to find someone new, but what happens if you can’t trust that relationship either?
With some self-published books there’s a lack of quality and need for a good and thorough edit, but then I’ve bought a few traditionally published before now that had no right to be anywhere near a bookshop!
Reverend Doctor Curtis Page
we are well on our way to the winter harvest...lettucehas risen by the plenty just like the terracotta soilders from the chinese emperors army...
This recipe is a wonderful example Italian bread. It is from a Serbian edition of the Italian magazine Sale and Peppe. Use whole olives of your choice or skip the olives and enjoy the simplicity of the great bread.
In our battles and our struggles, God is our sword: fending off every obstacle so that we can march forward.
So there is my round-up of Matchbook's footwear selection in the 50 Classics For Your Closet, and so far, so good. Not only do I have all of them, I wear all of them as well. Stay tuned for the second part when I will go through their accessories selection!
It had nothing to do with him (shoot, there were enough single girls after him to make any girl happy to be asked) but everything to do with me.
The Internet
Both parties were transformed by the new relationship: The animals grew tame and lost their ability to fend for themselves in the wild (natural selection tends to dispense with unneeded traits) and the humans traded their hunter-gatherer ways for the settled lives of agriculturists. (320)
Obama's cousin Odinga in Kenya ran for president and tried to get Sharia
As for the kids …
The relationship, the court heard, turned sour when he allegedly became aggressive towards their mother, who was wheelchair-bound after one of her legs was amputated due to cancer.
Looking back, all of our hosts have been wonderful in different ways. Several we still keep in touch with by email at different times. I guess if you're in the business of hospitality, you have to have special qualities as I imagine not all of us tourists are nice to deal with!!!!
This is to make sure we don't have 10 bloggers doing the same theme where it does become very monotonous.
Button
PG: 1.036
The SEC hasn’t disclosed the number of referrals. Only one lawyer has ever been banned for life from representing clients before the agency because of professional misconduct.
I would sit on you so good.
There will be 3 employeer, one chief and one vice manager and one planning assistant. Chief will be my uncle, vice a friend, and assistant my cousin. Everyone have different task, but all task forward line back to me in different ways.
That was it for the Saturday, then. Sunday saw me Back Once Again Like A Renegade Master, and first-of-all ensconcing myself in a seat in the Theatre Space. I am fond of both seats and the Theatre Space, because with these things you get to sit down. More importantly than that, though, I was very eager to see the tuba-doom (“doompah”, if you will) duo Ore. This was amazing – doom metal played on tubas, an inspired choice given that the tuba (as an instrument) provides not only the deep’n’low notes but also the appearance-of-a-massive-physical-struggle that you need to make this sort of thing seem convincing. It was only afterwards that I sussed out whyfore the name, too: ore, the essence of metal, in an unfamiliar form but left pure and stripped of artifice. “Ahar-har-har, that’s actually genuinely clever” I thought. Magnificent, anyway. I would like to see the two of them in collaboration with a didgeridoo player (because dronez) and a sousaphonist (because the sousaphone is the greatest instrument yet created).
(I don't think I'm going to be on any Olympic PR lists after this do you? Shame, beach volleyball is my thang)
The New Haven annual fishing tournament draws professional an amateur anglers alike to win the money reward, and this year Ross Springer is determined to win the top prize. He needs the money to leave a lasting impression at Bethel College. He had no idea that the scheme would hook Abigail Cushman, the girl who reminds him of all he had and lost every time she looks his way.
Now, when I say ‘diet’ I don’t mean that I will watch what I eat for 90 days and then, after reaching my goal weight, go back to eating all the candy I want. We all know that once you reach said weight, you have to maintain it… and you can’t do that by changing your diet back to the shit it was before.
And so it was that promptly after 'elevenses' Lady G sat herself down at the table, next to the writing bureau.
One can also have a character say or do the opposite of what is expected. The classic Lou Grant remark from Mary Tyler Moore is a good example: “You’ve got spunk,” a pause, then, “I hate spunk.” Or one can have a character struggle to come up with a witty remark and finally come out with a simple “Hi.”
Though I will say that only children of the age 16 or less will think that its heavy-handed message and name dropping of political terms like aristocrats is all complex and edgy and so deep and Japanese Cartoon is like the best thing ever and not kid stuff. But hey, if you think that Code Geass has realistic political intrigue and you can learn some real practical political shit from it then more power to you!
A: “Good, I liked the colors of my pajamas.”
Today, Weihenstephaner makes and distributes some ripping beers around the world. I have hosted a few beer dinners at restaurants and at nearly all of them I have managed to sneak in a ‘Steph. They range from the Original which is lagered for an extended time and is pale golden and refreshing, to the naturally cloudy and revitalising Hefe Weissbier and the dark, strong Korbinian, a double bock made for matching with roasts and smoked meat or fish. They make one of the finest Pilsners I have had the pleasure of downing as well as an award winning Kristallweissbier, made using a secret fermentation process, and an aromatic and malty Tradition.
The red hair's rather wayward and quite free;
Look closer, I'm wearing pink, spongy curlers. The SHAME!
B: Oh...
My classmate replied, “Una vez.”
Such an unexpected place, Stiffkey Stores combines gifts and homewares, a bakery, local produce and a cafe.
Yep, this is pretty much it….
Creation of Personal Book Blog
This is my neighbors recipe. We have eaten it several times in their home and they've brought it to us a couple times after surgery. (They're great neighbors & know it is my hubbies favorite.) It is delicious!
Likewise in the policy area. Social work education can give you the silly idea that policy is a big playpen where you get to stand up and mouth off, and people are supposed to take you seriously. You just blast away at your pet targets, and then you wait for them to hang their heads and beg your forgiveness. From what I’ve seen, even in one of the top schools, social work education grossly fails to train students to conceptualize, articulate, and defend controversial viewpoints against sincere, intelligent attack. I’m not suggesting that every social work student interested in policy should earn a joint degree in law or political science. I’m just saying that, if the educations and experiences of policy-oriented social workers don’t train them to develop and present their arguments knowledgeably and persuasively, in opposition to lawyers and political scientists, they can expect to be sidelined if not unemployed.
Should we live in a country in which simple, factual speech is considered a hate crime? A country where you can go to prison for saying something that rubs politicians the wrong way? A country where the lunatic fringe on the left can tell you what is and isn’t “hateful” or “racially charged?” About a thousand people already signed a petition saying they think so already, and I’m sure more of them will jump onto the bandwagon as it becomes fashionable. An absurd tsunami of political correctness is about to drown the nation just before the election, people – grab your fins and snorkels!
The Tour of Oman is part of the ongoing attempt to globalise cycling and will cover Muscat, Al Batinah region, Al Dhakaliya region and Al Dhahirah region. Hundreds and thousands of spectators are likely to witness the Tour which will complete 5 stages, 1 time trial over a distance of 850 kms.
Green Bay Packers: A
Feel free to add me on SC2, "AndrewWilson - 872"
Total Loss: 17.4
I would like to enter the following Challenges:-
Of course the sooner I finish the box set, the sooner I need to find something else to watch…
This was a title that I got from one of our elementary libraries that is being closed down. It is a short book with a variety of interesting facts about dogs, with plenty of appealing pictures. It addresses topics such as why dogs wag their tails, what color dogs' skin is under their fur, how long their memories are, and why do dogs lick people? (I did not know that the temple of Asklepios had dogs that would likc people to cure them of various ailments!) Of course, I probably already knew that dogs like us because we can scratch places on their backs that they can't reach. Sadly, this book appears to be out of print, but dust it oss to hand to a reluctant reader if it is in your library.
First, I must stop feeling sorry for myself, cease mourning for the loss of my baby of two decades, and get with the damned program. When NABC made its investment in brewing its own beers, it stopped being what it was before. It became something else, which always will be evolving, but in order to begin evolving, the program must change.
In your own profile, you’ve the option to toggle between a large-image and small-image grid, with the latter naturally allowing you to view more images at any one time. Meanwhile, if you tap the icon resembling the globe, you can view your images by geographical location – as you can with your stock Photos app, but in an interesting twist, you can also check out the locations of other people’s snaps – provided they’re geo-tagged, of course.
then beat in 1 egg and 1 tsp vanilla
Newt has stated that he will continue running all the way to the Tampa convention. Maybe someone also should tell him that he could still participate in the convention even if he stops the campaign.
I choose to love myself unconditionally, no matter how many mistakes I make in life! Amen!
As the world erupts into disorder, it’s important to look back at a time when those who look at that dismantling as not only an intellectual pursuit but a right of the people were considered dangerous enough that they had to be made examples of when opportunity knocked on the judge’s chamber.
My previous post chronicled my thought processes as I watched the video “Let It Be” that is making the rounds. As I said in that bloggery, At first I thought that perhaps this was the answer to my confusion over the death of my mate of thirty-four years. Just go on with my life and let it be. Forget my grief. Forget the pain of losing him. Forget trying to make sense of it all. Just . . . let it be.
It’s something to ponder, as I recall how every few hours we passed under a new gate of steel poles draped with tenting and flags, flapping to announce the new firm responsible for that stretch of dam construction, & heralding the bright future with slogans in Chinese such as, “Build a harmonious society with hydropower,” with mountains razed above, the river diverted below and debris — scrap stone, waste sand, disintegrating boulders – all around..
Next to chat to Pete were Harviestoun’s brewsters Amy and Krista who had brought along Schiehallion, Harviestoun’s sometime ground-breaking cask lager which is now also available in bottle and keg.
And for the third-place winner, we have a year’s subscription to TCM’s wonderful monthly magazine, Now Playing!
My only cavil about Seth in this book is that he seems to have learned so little in four hundred years, not about the stone, but about himself and his own temper. This leads to a bit too much unsconsidered bashing for my taste.
It was super easy and so far I’ve made pulled bbq pork, and a kale, sweet potato, pork stew. And I was able to freeze what was leftover after those two meals (by the way, we have leftovers from those meals too!). The butt cost around $20 but I think having several meals ready to go is worth it! I did forget to take picture of it after it was finished cooking but let me tell you: it was falling apart! Soo moist and tender.
He left the room and I burst into tears, for through that one poetic remark I recognized that he was seeing the “flower part” of me, a precious and pure, unsullied natural place within that I myself had long since forgotten was still in there somewhere. And I also knew I wasn’t special. He said every individual. What would that be like, to go through life seeing each person as if gazing at a flawless, beautiful blossom?
Honey and lemon or lime to taste.
It was a run for the ages but the fun didn't stop there. With York trying to win a 27th team title, #2 runner Ron Hedman was disqualified for physical contact with another runner. It has been speculated that it was everything from shoving to a punch in the face. I don't know for certain. Fortunately York's #6 stepped up and the team narrowly beat surprise team Lake Zurich by a 2 point margin to get a record 27th title for Coach Joe Newton.
That being said, I somehow managed to finagle my 6 foot 4 frame (Miu Miu heels) to the front of the photographer’s pen to acquire some intel: not to mention snag a few nifty iPhone snaps of the Kaiser and a subsequent earful of vitriol from several (not so tall) French shutterbugs.
The plot to Assassinate Castro
Smelling of years
Disc One:
The Congressional Subcommittee on Immigration, Citizenship and Border Security invited Stephen Colbert to testify--in character--about the working conditions of illegal immigrants on America's farms. Colbert participated in a United Farm Workers awareness campaign, and spent a day laboring at a vegetable farm in New York in August 2010.
I’m not much good with cooking consistently.
I’ve got about 9 weeks left to go until I can say “I’m finished.”
I speak English because when the Americans colonized the Philippines, they made sure that all the schools taught in English, and that system lingered even after independence. Science, math, home economics, accounting, and the like were all taught in English. The only subjects that were not taught in English were Filipino (duh) and Philippine History. In these subjects, the teacher would lecture in Filipino, but when we opened our books, sometimes they were in English, but we had to recite and write in Filipino.
MARCEL TYBERG
And some hate from the Tea Party.
Jeez! I'm not even going to focus on how long I was away from the blog and just dive on in to my post! :)
I decided to regularly post to my main blog, Musings of a Modern Mom
Riva turned her back to the doorway and stepped closer to us. “As you well know, a Beboodle is a sin eater, and if there is only evil in a person, it will consume the whole spirit of that person. Usually, though, you never know the Beboodle is working because life is full of small irritations and the Beboodle just ferrets the negative energy away without your ever realizing it. But…remember this…Even the most black-hearted people have relatives who love them — mothers, fathers, siblings. Not everyone is delighted that evil can be destroyed. When my mother was attacked? The mayor’s son disappeared. No one has heard from him since. That young man was through and through bad. Everyone in town was glad he was gone, except for his family. They adored him. Watch your step, ladies.”
They believe in making you work for your appointments here.
Our network specialists cover the areas of International Relations, Public Diplomacy, Culture and Culinary Arts, Music, Tourism and Travel, Religion, Politics, Government, Community Affairs, Non-Profits, Celebrities and Personalities.
The discord set in with the band when Lani became too much. As you can all see, Lani controls pretty much all of their shit. Their Facebook, their twitter. NONE of what you saw was Jackson, Jerad, Ben, Ben or Uncle. It was her. The overuse of smiley faces gave that shit away.
I received a bottle of this limited-edition wild ale from Rick at Big Foamy Head. It's been in the back of my beer fridge since it arrived here in February. My intent was to allow it to age for a year or two, but then a cloud of WTF came over me recently. You know the drill. So I decided to break it out and pair it with something I thought it might compliment, or vice versa.
With the coming of new heroes that meant that before too long these heroes would team-up. Julius Schwartz at DC commissioned his writer Gardner Fox to come up with a new Superhero team. He didn’t like the word “Society” as it sounded too snooty, but he liked the word league as it evoked the idea of a team. The tag line at the end of their first adventure read “Just Imagine: Your favorite heroes together all in one book.” For the readers they felt like they could get adventures of five characters for the price of one.
handed over to Security Service 23;
What is the most difficult part of writing for you?
Every time he took the microphone, the specially invited CAMRA members on my table heckled him, bellowing “P2 stout! Give us some P2 stout!” Now, this is a remarkable beer. But it wasn’t available. The first time they demanded it, Steve explained that there was none available because it hasn’t been brewed for a while. This didn’t put them off. The first time it could be excused as good-humoured banter. As the evening wore on, it just became fucking rude.
tree branches and tried to see heaven.
as a blackbird
I was listened to intently, which I appreciated. She explained to me that she treats symptoms rather than depending on hormonal blood work to give her answers (ok, for now). In a way this makes sense to me because from what I read, your hormones one day may not be the same as the next, and what they treat you for based on those results may not work consistently. She wants me to start taking a list of vitamins - vitamins! - to help control my symptoms. If this doesn't work, then we can move on and try something else. This is what was recommended:
Why the Siren Likes It: See Return to Peyton Place. Plenty of lush period visuals, and there are pleasures to be had from Orson Welles even in unworthy roles (this one tinged with painful self-parody). But it's a pretty bad movie, though hardly the offense to all civilization that Walter Chaw paints it, and Elizabeth Taylor is an unconvincing version of Vivien Leigh. (Note to Mr. Chaw: Rod Taylor was a native Australian.) The Siren likes this primarily for Maggie Smith as the devoted secretary. I do love Dame Maggie. Christina Hendricks is good, but she still could learn something from what Smith accomplishes with a cliched role. Smith's scene with Richard Burton is the highlight, the so-so writing propped up with perfectly timed and calibrated reactions and beats.
I’m not especially brand loyal, and I also think that often there’s no big difference between one product and another in terms of functionality – most things on the shelf are probably pretty effective, but no one brand works for everyone. It comes down to a mix of personal brand preference and finding something your skin “takes” to. You just have to keep trying until you find something that works.
a retentive memory,
Ah, milk and honey; two of my many favorite foods, and even better when consumed together.
Studio 490: Art By Hand, He Ruled It Art, Fashion Style And Art; Art Parts - Tools For Art
15 push press (95#/65#)
Collective Action
Here's the card image. The sheep wasn't colored in but I spread two way glue on it and Dazzling Diamonds glitter It's such an easy design. I also matted the image cardstock in black but only gave it piping instead of a larger mat.
Oh, and apparently, Zoe was telling the truth about her friends at summer camp wearing bras. Lizzie told her mom (Ali) the same thing and named names. Who knew! I say enjoy not wearing a bra as long as you can get away with it.
She might as well be wearing a name tag that says "HI! MY NAME IS HIGH-MAINTENANCE -- WHAT'S YOURS?"
My review today is on the Loreal Youth Code foaming cleanser. I picked mine up at wallgreens a few days ago. It was on sale for $7.99. Which I think was an amazing deal. You get a ton of product!
Nonetheless, on 10th April I held no delusions. I was certain even more proof would be sent to my attention; perhaps not so soon, not so very graphically.
Then they took uncut stones, according to the law, and built a new altar like the former one.
Enjoy this simple and tasty root vegetable dish on a cold night. The recipe is designed to highlight the flavors of the vegetables, and not be a heavy, creamy dish.
Well that's all from me for now...hopefully this is a coherent post! lol! I'm a bit loopy. Have a great day folks...Thanks for stopping by!
Anyway, no matter how bad the worst of McCartney’s Beatles compositions were, they are nothing compared to the worst excesses of his solo and Wings years. You could easily fill a double CD with some of the bollocks he’s produced since the greatest band that ever walked the planet split. The world can get by quite happily without one version of Oobu Joobu: it certainly does not need six! And as for certified turds like Morse Moose and the Grey Goose, Wonderful Christmastime, Bip Bop, Spies Like Us, the stupid The Other Me (with its ridiculous opening couplet ‘I know I was a crazy fool for treating you like I did, but something got a hold of me and I acted like a dustbin lid’), Move Over Busker, that awful bloody Frog Chorus garbage and almost all of his moronic vanity projects, such as the Thrillington album (instrumental versions of the hugely underrated Ram), the Country Hams, Rockestra and so on, the world would be a better place without them.
This fortnight the challenge at Gothic Arches is to use a photograph or a digital image on our arch. I searched through scanned family photos to find this one of my mother and her sister (second left and centre) sitting out overnight in Hyde Park to get a good spot to watch the next day’s Coronation procession.
I feel like I’m at a crossroads. I don’t know what I should do next. I think the best thing would be to stick with my current job and try to go for any potential future openings. However, there is the little matter of me wanting to be able to afford my meds.
And it breaks him. It breaks the hard shell of anger to what is really underneath. My harsh words have placed layer and layer of hard protection around his tender heart, and when I tell him I’m sorry, when I tell him I am wrong, the shell cracks. And what is soft inside seeps out. It pours down his face, dripping off his nose and his chin. This is no longer the face of an angry child, this is the face of a child who is hurt and needing love, not frustration; hugs, not yells. And that softness brings me to my knees, asking the Lord to take away my sinful nature. Let me never hurt my children with my words again.
Once a venue is confirmed, and a Twitter host assigned – the host is responsible for selecting a local charity who will best benefit from the blankets and/or clothing received at the Tweetup.
It is popular during festive occasions or wedding in South East Asian countries. To avoid sticking to the bottom of the pan, stir constantly and make use of your non stick utensil if you have. Adjust the dry chili used according to your tolerance, normally this is quite spicy with a hint of sweetness.
And here you go pictures of our First Day, but you don't get the best pictures yet just the very start of our first day. Now you will have to wait for 2 more days when I show you the Scrap Book Pages of our First Day at Magic Kingdom. Tomorrow's Scrap Book pages I posted are of our trip and condo in Florida.
More on the subject of meeting my biological parents over on the weekend, when I’ll have more time.
2. JUMPING TO CONCLUSIONS: making negative assumptions about another person's motivation or intent without sufficient evidence.
On Friday four of my friends from classes at the Loft came over to help tie JAM tags on my market giveaway.....They made quick work of the 500 twig pencils I ordered....Patty, Beth, Karen and Susy were speed demons!
#2 A good story transplants you in another world. It is a well-known fact that I love Harry Potter. I'm not afraid to admit it and I was recently "roasted" concerning this apparent obsession of mine in an all-school assembly. Which only serves to make me happy and not embarrassed. Why is HP the shelf that literary genius will be reaching for and not quite touching for the foreseeable future? It is simple. Because Rowling created a world no one can resist. That doesn't mean that there aren't other amazingly well-written and life-changing tomes being published and cherished on a regular basis. It doesn't mean that there aren't thousands or even millions of pages of prose dedicated to creating new worlds in our minds. But Harry Potter is literally magical. And Rowling makes her readers long for it to be real. She pulls the Hogwarts Express right up to your door and hollers at you to get on before it's too late. And, of course, you do.
Calling
“But these things are selling like hot cakes in the States”, he alleged, “and it’s the same sales talk”.
Here in this hall where we all are gathered for this symposium on women rights, I will tell you Uloma’s story and I hope you understand all that I now know…I hope above all too, that I find forgiveness…
would not be so drastic..
This week's contest is being hosted by professional artist Chickory In addition to the Badge of Great Honor, the winners will be getting original signed Chickory Artwork.
So…since this blog is pretty much all about me…and entirely narcissistic…you know that I am not above blowing my own horn. I am amazing…not only did I run this race—and finish it in excruciating pain—but I was one of the first done. It was a ghost town by all of the water bottle/fruit/hamburger stations when I finished…and about 5 minutes later…hoards of people came in.
Vader looks from Palpatine to Luke to the Girl Scouts back to Palpatine then to the Girl Scouts and down to Luke and to the Girl Scouts...scene goes on longer than it probably should before he steps over, picks up Palpatine and chucks him into the power core shaft
You don’t have to have a blog to play along with the sketch challenge. If you upload your project to any on-line galleries or forums, please use the keyword of WMSC51.
2. Rain on the Scarecrow- John Mellencamp
Rating: 4.3
Would you believe this printer's tray slipped into my box whilst away (oddly enough just as money slipped out of my purse!) I've wanted to do a large one like this for some time, and now I can - when I decide on a theme!
Morgen: Historical is incredibly popular. I had three agents tell me at Winchester Writers Conference last year that they want more of it (and crime). Have you had any rejections? If so, how do you deal with them?
Sandisk Memory Zone allows you to backup files and apps from your phone’s SD card to a cloud storage provider. This free app from the world-renowned maker of flash memory cards can backup to and restore from the following supported services: Box, Dropbox, Google Docs, Picasa, SugarSync, and Facebook.
a = 440 = chord 6
so there you have it. my working career or lack of...
93. Six Pack -- Black Flag
7. Numb And Intoxicated 03:26
But back to a quick and dirty method.
It may not be a perfect industry - but then neither are the worlds of sport, fine art, music or literature. All similarly offer entertainment and enrichment. But fashion rises above these others in flack-attraction.
Balblair and anCnoc are single malts that have only been on the US market for a little over a year. Both are owned by Inverhouse, a subsidiary of Thai Beverage (ThaiBev) which also owns the Pulteney, Speyburn and Balmenach distilleries.
Hebrews 11:6 But without faith it is impossible to please him: for he that cometh to God must believe that he is, and that he is a rewarder of them that diligently seek him.
the bright lights and the free flow of alcohol; the wild dancing and the pulsing beats; the cab rides and the shared conversations; the sleepless nights and the fuck buddy concept – we could live like that, no? the next day we’ll repeat the cycle all over again – we’ll do club hopping and mall walking and chain smoking when we’re dressed and ready. we call everyone else sluts because they are, and we stick to the hos over bros rule because it’s catchy like that. we keep telling ourselves we’ll behave better, but the next minute we’ll forget it all and down another straight shot. we normally eat only non-fat non-carbs non-protein food, but when we succumb to temptations we’ll just starve for the next few days. we’ll complain of hurting feet and sore thighs because we’ve danced it away the night before, but we never stop walking anyway. we convince ourselves we deserve much better, but we never take that first step away from the abuse.
7. My friends. Oh, goodness. How to survive things like this is there's no one to talk to, no one to support you? I was so very grateful especially that we had friends that were within walking or biking distance, and that we could support each other. And, of course, the beach house of a certain friend that we could escape to. That was important too. :)
I store my buttons in little glass jam jars with raspberries on the lids (too sweet!). So I thought I would make a sparkly little pin cushion/button jar gift to accompany my card. This is a cut glass canning jar that I picked up at Hobby Lobby for a song. I used a scrap of fabric and cotton batting to create the cushion portion. Then I set about decorating the jar with layers of felt die cut borders, flowers and an assortment of buttons. And there you have it friends. Next up on the hop
So precious I have to do this! Use red paint for the hands and stamps for the be mine in the middle. You can have your students put a sticker heart or draw a heart. This is the best card their parents could get and will probably keep for years to come!
What’s so spectacular about this near rape hotel scene is that Rajiv insults Ganga, but it’s not until he makes disparaging remarks against India that she snaps! After the insults to India, the fight is on and she beats him up. I believe he does get one tight slap to the face in, but once Ganga is fired up, her rage for defending her mother India is unstoppable! She escapes after knocking him out, and as luck would have it, some of Arjun’s home boys catch wind of Ganga’s location at a truck stop near Las Vegas. Please note the brick phone, I didn’t take this screen cap for nothing!
striped pijamas. He did a good job telling the conflict.
FH: English I think.
Lifted
I'll admit that it is kind of cool to be able to easily change the size of my photos. I am pretty sure I could do this before, but you know, since I kept clicking my photos when I thought it would perhaps be worth the effort to copy and paste them into the right order, I realized just how easy it was to make this one a bit smaller.
I was afraid the sound of crunching leaves under my feet would wake him from his nap, but he did not move a muscle as I edged closer to the tree.
The price of veterinary service would have to be taken into consideration. Various veterinarians can charge higher fees than others. Based on the actual illness, service could be lengthy and extensive. As such, you really need to locate an affordable vet and, hopefully, one which can give payment plans when needed.
A great big honking interview that has, apparently, scooped each and every other blogger in the world. And I got it.
Hair Color: BALD
To be sure, Jesus was a radical Jew — but his radicalism was religious and personal, not political or statist. Indeed, the notion that Jesus was some sort of justice warrior on behalf of the poor and downtrodden — and that government welfare programs are therefore “what Jesus would want” — precisely misunderstands the difference between the religious and the political, and between the personal and the public/governmental. Jesus felt enormous compassion for the poor and the oppressed, and acted personally on that compassion — as, it is fair to say, he would urge all of us to do. But he never advocated a power-structure program or any governmental redistribution initiative — not because he opposed or supported such statist programs, but because they were utterly irrelevant to his religious and personal message.
Burch was received from Los Angeles County on February 3, 2011, and was serving a 675-year sentence for lewd and lascivious acts with a child under 14, oral copulation with a child under 14, and rape with force/violence.
But seriously what would you do ... with right comes responsibilities, I wonder... did no one notice a man following a child what if it were a white youth and a Black male would teh neighbors have heard calls for help and done nothing!
Much of the White Nile’s waters evaporate in the vast Sudd swamp of Sudan, so it is the waters of the Blue Nile that are most at stake. Ethiopia’s Prime Minister, Meles Zenawi, is intransigent in defence of his right to use this water to drive development.
Increase energy, alertness, mental calmness, and ability to concentrate
Monica Sone said to Betty MacDonald Memorial Award winner Wolfgang Hampel:
I’ve stayed up ridiculous hours collecting addresses and designing things……….and yes, falling asleep on my computer more times than I can count. But once I get the invitations out I can relax……….a little.
happy anniversary my love.
2 (10.75 ounce) cans condensed cream of chicken soup
Urban Decay Naked2 Eye Shadow in Foxy
In the End I’d like to quote Dorothy Parker
it’s only a guess
On Thursday, Kate put Alex to bed just as his eyelids got heavy and left the room. He immediately started crying. The crying intensified once he realized Kate wasn't coming right back in. Three minutes passed. Kate went in to comfort him without picking him up. The crying subsided momentarily, then picked up as she left the room. Six minutes passed. I went into the room, stroked his chest and told him everything was going to be all right. Then I left and the crying picked up again.
Where by to receive this kind of valuable 12 month mobile phone cellphone contracts? Web based outlets handling mobile phone handsets are usually fine method. By means of touring these on the internet internet site, you’ve gotten the particular opportunity to be able to experience a variety of mobiles who are out there on 12 months contract time frame. Lookup any equipment which will is suited to ones own requires and find on the contract to get 1 year. Having said that, become wary to make correct homework on the dealer previous to finalizing some offer.
Anyone sneezing yet at the mere thought of that?
Q Mr. President, to follow on Chip’s question, you said that the Speaker faces tough politics in his caucus. Do you have complete confidence that he can deliver the votes on anything that he agrees to? Is he in control of his caucus?
And a few "what on earth?" moments!
Once inside the “we don’t really need you here” vibe continues, as staff hustle and bustle without seeming to notice the people queueing for tables, until you are suddenly called to your seat. Le Chateaubriand is not big, but its dark wooden floors, wooden tables and high ceilings make the space feel larger than it is, and all the noise, conversation and rushing about doesn’t seem to quite fit with what is supposedly the #9 restaurant in the world.
Pinterest suddenly had the uncanny ability to make me feel like a failure at life.
The notion that science and spirituality are somehow mutually exclusive
This room is a very odd shape, with two attic doors and a dormer, so there
Plot, casting, look, and themes weirdly similar to Good Will Hunting, except everything is taken to the extreme in GWH.
Order today! Operators are standing by to take your call!
This weekend’s full Moon will appear as such because it will actually be closer to the Earth. Astronomers refer to this event as a perigee moon.
I forgot to take a before picture - or an after picture for that matter (maybe later), but one and a half large trash bags and 3 hours later (half of that done last night and half this morning) and the closet looks better and contains supplies my kids will actually use. Normally, I don't like to throw that much stuff away. I'd rather recycle, donate, or give it away but since most of it was ripped paper, colored-in coloring books, dried-out markers, and bits and pieces of who-knows-what, most of it didn't seem worthy enough for anything but the trash.
— Michael Tanner is a senior fellow at the Cato Institute and the author of Leviathan on the Right: How Big-Government Conservatism Brought Down the Republican Revolution.
With their 33rd-round pick in the First-Year Player Draft on Wednesday, the Texas Rangers selected University of Georgia outfielder Johnathan Taylor, who suffered partial paralysis after injuring his spine in a game on March 6.
What do you think? Do you like movies better if they reflect your own worldview? Does it even matter? Which of these two do you prefer and why?
Him: Are you marrying a French man?
Katrina Parker from Team Adam was next, singing Christina Perri’s ‘Jar of Hearts’ (which was popularized by another reality show, So You Think You Can Dance) with great emotion and grace.
Did you know that if it weren’t for liberals, America would be the most one-sided arrogant supremacist and overbearingly religious pseudo-Christian nation on the planet to this day?
“The Church knew what the psalmist knew: Music praises God. Music is well or better able to praise him than the building of the church and all its decoration; it is the Church’s greatest ornament.”
Source: Kindle (owned)
I have told this message to over 20,000 people I have presented to in the past many years and it is always the same
The sakura flowers were preserved with salt, but even though I soaked them for 30mins, the petals still tasted a little salty. Don't ask me how does sakura smell like...I wasn't able to detect any floral fragrant, not during baking or when the cake was left to cool. Except for the slight salty taste (not the salted fish or salted vegetables kind of salty), the cake tasted like an ordinary sponge cake, or 鸡蛋糕. Sad to say, the sakura paste or sakura essence, did not add any flavour to it, it did not even add any colour to it. I had imagined that the pinkish essence would turn the batter into a nice pinky batter...but no, it has no effect at all :(
First of all, when you pack clothes to come here, it is advised that you bring light and cotton clothes because it is seriously hot here. Yangon’s temperature usually averages at about 27 degree Celsius and it’s hotter during the summer(March-May). It’s summer now and we’re now averaging at 35 degrees Celsius. And Central Burma is even hotter, averaging at 40 degrees Celsius. So, bring your summer clothes. The lighter it feels, the better.
passed by the enormous Waterloo station (will have to go inside next time) and eventually came out just west of Waterloo Bridge. Walking westward along the Thames riverside pavement, I passed by the London Eye, the majestic and extra large “carousel”, that you can’t miss seeing from basically anywhere from the central part of London along the Thames. While I did not hop on this time I did find out it is only 18 Pounds (after tax) so not nearly as expensive as I thought it was. So, I think I will put this on my list of things to do!
When you face the end alone
"See? There you go again!"
Officers will be recognized for the exemplary jobs they have done on specific service calls in the past year. Among those receiving commendations will be Officers Julio Jiminez and Jonathan Martinez for helping to save the life of a man who had jumped into the East River in February. The Public Safety Department will also recognize RIOC groundskeepers Jamal Perry and Nelson Soltren who assisted in the rescue. Additionally, Officers Christian Gilmore and Michael Cabassa will both be officially promoted to the rank of Detective, and a Roosevelt Island resident will receive a special award for assistance given to the department in the last year.
2 tsp red chillies
Somewhere on that sheet of paper
The process will enable the reduction of by-products, and it will convert carbon dioxide into carbonates, which in turn, can be used as building materials produced on a large scale.
more in love with my career.
The economy was very bad at this point, so it was back to the same old cooking, cleaning, and general chores in a one bedroom trailer situation. The straw that broke the camels back was when I admitted to her that I didn't want to go to our local community college because it had none of the Bachelor or Associate degrees that I wanted.
Well there ya have it, My ode to 2011. I truly am blessed to have each of you in my life and along for the journey. We have many things in common even though we may not think so. Thank you for being there, for giving me a reason to get up and go some mornings and for sharing your lives with me. Until next year...
For instance, the ‘how does 200 calories look?’ page is an excellent visual representation, via images, of something that can often be difficult to grasp. The physical representation/visualisation holds much more power and emphasis than numbers on a paper ever will. The imagery of a bowl of vegetables juxtaposed against a hand full of French fries offers a stark reality of the benefits of eating healthily. It is these visualisations that allow people to gain further insight and understanding into concepts that are often too verbose or expansive.
Thank you, we have already counted your vote.
Mother: Uhhh….ohhh(crying)….ehhhh(crying)….uhhhh(crying)……
The room was more silent this day than any other. Even though we were in the boys' room, with the special mothers, and all the other children that slept in that room. There was no crying, or talking. No loud movements.
I've been having all these signs that my body is working at getting him out of there (WARNING TMI): losing my mucus plug, menstrual style cramping, dried blood in my ever increasing amount of discharge, i haven't had a solid bowel movement in weeks, the kid has dropped...a LOT. But my cervix is apparently still behind my son's head, it's not really effaced at all and it's only dilated to about 1.5 cm. I feel like a failure that my body seems to be working so hard and NOTHING, almost nothing is happening. It's not just that I'm jealous that they all have their babies right now (obviously that's part of it), but their bodies did things right and mine seems like it doesn't know what to do and I'm left mad and frustrated...and hugely, uncomfortably pregnant without any sign of relief. I know...I won't be pregnant forever, but I had this idea that I was going to be able to do this thing naturally. That I wouldn't have to force my body to get this kid out, that it was going to be wonderful, beautiful experience. Now it's probably going to end up with me being induced with either my kid being so drugged upon his arrival or me being drugged from a c-section that I won't be able to appreciate it like I expected to. And of course, having to wait to do any of this for another 2 wks because my OB/GYN clinic won't induce me until 41 wks.
A check of the Mr. Beer Fans Forum yielded some useful advice along with frequent admonitions to be patient and leave the thing alone. Several of the local experts suggested actually pouring a bit of the product into a glass for inspection and taste testing. Per their input, if the wort still has any sort of sweet taste to it, then it’s not done fermenting. Ideally, according to the brewing guru’s, the product should taste something like flat beer.
Even if you are not a Christian or you don’t have another religion holding you up and I’m saying this because God has and does keep me up, that life is too short to live it in bitterness, sometimes you just need to see the good things in life and decide to be happy. This doesn’t mean that you can’t ever be sad, but give it a place. We as individuals can choose our own attitudes at any time.
The above situation forms the basis of the argument that almost all organizations have been dealing with an isolated aspect of the whole problem of Human Trafficking and hence calling for joint efforts for successful movement amongst Counter Human Trafficking organizations in East Africa but in also in the whole world if possible since the problem is becoming a global phenomenon. This means that social networking has much relevance for organizations so that they are capable of assisting one another in dealing with the issue of Human Trafficking in its totality and not just in isolated pieces of working as demonstrated above.
Distortion or not, German galleries are not impressed with the Commission's thinking. Many, including the Deutscher Kunstrat (German Council of Fine Arts) and the Federal German Gallery Association, are trying to prevent the threatened tax increase. Some have also pointed out that German galleries are already required to pay additional taxes which those in other countries are not, and that the artists' resale right is strictly enforced in Germany - leaving them particularly vulnerable.
Mopar195@yahoo.com
Ribbon - Offray - 7/8 Grosgrain Brown
“Geez, it sounds like a love fest.”
I returned from my sortie, bereft of any CCR. I logged on to the Beer Advocate site and found that the 2010 batch was only released in Oregon, parts of Washington State and Hawaii. Sigh. That’s that.
2. Authors that know how to tell a story
The responsibility problem has two sides: “They are responsible for my reality” and “I am responsible for their reality.” Both are illusions that lead to conflicts and unhappiness.
When you unzip the download you will find quite a few files, most for demonstration. There are only three files I use in this session – securimage.php, securimage_show.php, and AHGBold.ttf. Place these in a convenient directory, easily accessible to all of your forms. I place this kind of general use library in my ‘resources’ folder at the document root. In this case I will call it captchaPak.
Phenomenally.
The Right to consider all available options for how to achieve full profitability of their business is now prohibited by law. That's worth repeating. It's now illegal to accomodate your guests in a hospitality based business by allowing the use and consumption of a legal product on private property.
Cost: Varies
Participants were feeling inspired by their counterparts in New York City, who were given the boot by police earlier this week.
Facebook likes: 30,685
rubber stamps to reflect her distinct, altered-arts voice.
9) End your posts with a concisely written question – don’t just slap on a question, so many of us do. Put a good elegant question at the end that makes your readers want to comment. Narrow it down to one question so you’re driving the conversation where you want it to go. They’re going to make a commitment to making a comment, so make it something that is where you want it to go. These are not yes/no questions but ones that make your readers think and share. It’s an opportunity to say something new, not something you already said in a post. Since all your real estate on the page is important, use it well.
Now, I don’t know if its the new table (although I did see an uptick after its arrival) or if his sister is giving him lessons on the side, but Ryan has begun dancing. And I don’t mean a little occasional bouncing when he hears a song he likes. I mean stops what he’s doing when he hears so much as a tv jingle and busts a move. He puts his whole body into it too.
4. Garnish with fennel fronds and top with toasted walnuts. Season to taste with additional salt and pepper, if necessary.
One story caught my eye on the evening of the first day, when it mentioned two teenagers who were trying to find their mother, Donna Manning, a producer and presenter for Canterbury TV. She and fifteen of her colleagues along with forty or more foreign students and teachers were in the collapsed CTV building.
Samantha mentally rolls her eyes, fearing she doesn't have the time to do it physically. She absolutely hates it when Dr. Brighton turns politician. Everyone knows there are survivors in the city... specifically, Manhattan Island. Even the military acknowledged that the satellite evidence suggests pockets of actual humans fighting for their lives... some even making do quite well, no doubt waiting for rescue and wondering why the Hell it isn't coming.
At least 9/10ths of the success of this blog depends upon how often I post. The better posts, for me, are those like the last one - simple rules for managing intoxication in the game. The more common posts are more like this the one I'm about to write: drivel designed to keep the latest post on this blog from drifting into week-old territory.
Peeved: Here’s the deal. Ready? I just need to grab these things real quick. You all need to behave because Santa is watching and if you don’t behave you’ll get coal in your stocking. Smalls, you’re in the stroller. Biggie, you’re pushing the stroller. You both stay right next to me and offer your opinions if and only when asked. I need you to be my elves tonight. We are not shopping for ourselves, we are shopping for gifts for others. Got it? Elves. Helpers.
If Moshe Rabbeinu would be there, which minyan would he choose to join?
Ks is touring as the opening for Rihanna’s Last Girl on Earth concert. Alex is currently the touring drummer for The Strokes frontman Julian Casablancas.
This is an image I drew, using pastels many years back, which was a replica of a very unique image of the Sacred Heart which was owned by my great grandfather. This was going to be my design for the embroidered Sacred Heart, I would also use the ivy pattern around edges as well.
Thirdly, the level of detail provided by the CBI to justify its macroeconomic parameters is woeful. Okay, some of the parameters will be based on previous forecasts from the EU, but what about asset prices which are critical to the stress tests because they are determinative of future property loan losses in the banks. To take a specific example, just how did the CBI arrive at a baseline decline in residential property in 2011 of 13.4%? Not a denary 10% or 20%, not an even 12% or 14% but 13.4%? How did the CBI come up with a number as precise as this? I don’t know but I expect the question will be asked in the coming days. So the following is only a guess for the moment – I figure the CBI forecast the overall peak to trough decline of 55% (base) and 60% (adverse) and then forecast that 2012 would be the bottom before a recovery took hold in 2013. And then, it had a go at creating two roughly even numbers in 2011 and 2012 and then represented those numbers as percentages that in compound terms would result in an even 55% or 60% decline from peak. But why 55% and 60% drops from peak? Why an even split between 2011 and 2012? Why a bottom on 2012 with a recovery in 2013?
As both a moral and opinionated man, McGoohan held strong views and was forceful about seeing that they were carried out. He had insisted at the very first meeting on the script for the first episode that the bedroom scene be cut out. In fact, he stipulated that romantic involvements would have to be eliminated if he were to play the role, and consequently none appeared in either this series or the ‘Secret Agent’ series that followed.
We need to be Likeminded: This means we need to have the same goal: to worship the one true God and share the one true gospel with others. Churches who are not united on this have no power to change the world since they are not united on their message.
Today I am linking up for WILW. You know the drill...
“THE box.”
2) TOS -- a total waste of time. A significant number of blogs are in violation of their terms of service for a multitude of reasons. Reporting them is a waste of time as no action is taken. No action and no communication. I used to faithfully report dead blogs and nada, zip, no soup for you when it came to getting them taken care of. Pop-ups, redirects, auto-play audio, spam sites are all listed as a violation of their TOS.
Race Record: Starts: 23; Wins: 7; 2nd; 7; 3rd: 1; Win & Place Prize Money: £609,039
One half of one percent control forty-six percent of all wealth, while millions of people slip into poverty. The images are different, but the result is the same.
"uh oo" - Love you. At first, she said this in answer to us saying "I love you." Now, she'll tell us out of the blue. I'm so thankful.
This is a quick read, it's geared to guide you on that first step, to help you connect or reconnect with God. To reach up, reach out to our Loving and Gracious Father.
Put the rinsed beans, lemon juice and rosemary in a bowl then squeeze the roasted garlic out of their skins into the bowl as well. Drizzle with 1 or 2 tbsp of extra virgin olive oil and blend with a stick blender or in a food processor. Drizzle in the rest of the oil while blending until you have reached a kind of sticky mashed potato consistency. Season well with salt & black pepper, taste and add more lemon juice if you want. Add more olive oil if you want it more liquidy. Heat the bean puree in a pan and serve drizzled with olive oil & a sprig of rosemary garnish.
Discussion of the Ring or Hob Type Thread Milling Process
Chris's mom made Thanksgiving dinner this year. So the food was A-MAZE-ING. And since I've been sick the last two years, resulting in me foregoing my usual holiday gluttony, I decided to go balls to the wall this year.
Each candle is handpoured with 5 ounces of scented soy wax of your choice using only cotton core wicks. Each candle is embellished with a french label printed on handmade silk papier, a mother of pearle button and a vintage silky seam binding bow adding to the victorian flair of each. All done in an apothecary style jar with cover.
Illegal, but still the organizations on whose freedoms the ADL intruded were the White Aryan Resistance and the like. I won't shed any tears, here, but go on...
Life is an immortal spectator
Along the way, however, I began running into some annoyances here and there. Like when someone might come up to me after a service and say, “Hey, I really think you missed the Holy Spirit today…” or during rehearsal, I’d just flat out hit a wall and proclaim, “I really don’t want to sing that same line 47 times, and I don’t think that ushers in the presence of God.”
Carson McCullers. I don't know how I've missed her all these years, but it more than likely comes from using the Goodwill as my own personal library. I'd never read her before but am happy I found "A Heart is a Lonely Hunter" last week because it is one of the best books I have ever read. McCullers understood the nature of people and brings them home for me.
But first, how did Absolut come about?
I will not be hosting anyone this year..
by Catherine Ahern
If you are in the mood for a light fun read I would recommend this book (no matter what your age!).
Not easy to explain, but this ad has characters named after some basic Japanese “magic words” of basic manners. The names are a play on words in Japanese…but when translated into English, the word-pun is lost.
I was on the high way in a matter of minutes, and no one appeared to be chasing me. My hands shook as I checked my camera, it was unharmed. Then I reached inside my pocket for the tape recorder. I pulled it out. It and my hand were covered in blood. Then I felt it. The worst pain I have ever felt in my life. I felt for where the wound was and applied pressure.
His is one of those terrible R & B years-in-the-darkness stories — obscurity, drugs, homelessness — that’s way too common. (Rest in peace, Howard Tate.) In the late ’90s Williams began his current incarnation as an underground indie rock elder statesman. He recorded for some of my favorite labels including Bloodshot, Norton, In the Red, and Pravda.
1 Tbls. curry powder
Sharon Dane arrived in Australia with her parents at the age of 16. She was awarded a PhD in Social Psychology at the University of Queensland. Her area of research interest is the relationship between social inclusion and psychological well-being. Sharon is currently employed as a social scientist at a leading research organisation.
Anne herself recognized that she had over-stepped the boundaries of appropriate wifely behavior. At her trial, insisting that she was “clear of all the offences which you have laid to my charge,” she went on to acknowledge, not only her “jealous fancies” but her failure to show the King “that humility which his goodness to me, and the honours to which he raised me, merited.”[13] Anne’s recognition that she had not shown the King enough humility, in this context, shows remarkable insight into the gender politics that undoubtedly played a role in her downfall. She stood accused of adultery and treason. Yet she did not simply refute those charges; she admitted to a different “crime”: not remaining in her proper “place.” In juxtaposing these two, Anne seems to be suggesting that not only did she recognize that she had transgressed against the norms of wifely behavior, but that this transgression was somehow related to the grim situation she now found herself in.
but here they are, in no particular order.
and only it,
Controls in the Wii adjustment are just what you'd expect: move with the Nunchuk joystick, aim with the Remote, shoot with the B trigger. Trapping ghosts is the aloft as the Terminal Absoluteness version, except that the bold tells you what administration to bang the ghost, instead of whatever administration you want.
Aphex Twin: Hangable Light Bulb - Electronica helped me study for grad school, and this was the most interesting of what I found this spring.
Note that the lamp still has the plastic cover on the shade. This is not a style choice, although would we not all agree that plastic covering on furniture is a completely legitimate option for grandmothers who do not want their sofas to be stained by grandchildren's dirty hands?
There will be great opportunities to meet brand folks and learn best practices in the ever- changing social space.
Terribly unhappy in his family's crowded New York City apartment, Sam Gribley runs away to the solitude and danger of the mountains, where he finds a side of himself he never knew.
Your virginity is yours to keep and a gift to give, don't feel like you owe it to anyone to give it up for dinner and a movie. And you don't have to fuck someone to prove you love them.
Lamech’s sons are said to be the fathers of everyone who has a certain talent: the first fathers the nomads and ranchers, the second is dad to of all the musicians, and the third is ancestor for all the metalworkers. Oh, and there was a daughter named Naamah, but she didn’t pass down anything to her descendants. Lamech then tells his wives that he has killed a man (unnamed, but presumably still close family at this point), but that it was self-defense, or else retribution for being wounded first. God is still hanging around talking to people, so the fact that Lamech isn’t cursed like Cain seems to say that his actions are approved of.
Posted by Justin "The Claw" at 12:23 PM 1 comments
Ok some pictures from the past week!
Roll out pie crust to about 1/4 inch thick and cut out rectangular pieces to desired size. For my template, I used the broad side of a Stash Tea box – it worked perfectly. Two nine inch crusts should make about six pop-tarts.
Anyhow I had this very vivid dream about a woman wearing a yellow shirt that had red lipstick painted on it. And it was a familiar woman, but not so much a woman who I am familiar with. One of those weird instances where someone makes an appearance in your dream, and from then on they just kind of stand out more than they used to. We’ll it’s like that.
"He is dead! I saw him! Or he was dead anyway... Oh! My! Gosh! There really is such a thing as a zombie bat-moth! Run for your lives, kids! He'll eat your brains!"
Last week, President Barack Obama described the prostitution scandal as ‘a little distracting’ and branded the 12 agents involved ‘knuckleheads’.
Daughter bathed and I showered, we then enjoyed a nice warm tea, her of pizza, I, the son and Mr N enjoyed spaghetti Bolognese. Maybe a chance of an early night tonight after that very, very long walk.
Hmmm, I am trying to think of what else there is to tell you all, but I can't really think of anything, so if you have questions, feel free to ask! I'm pretty much an open book. Glad to have you visit! And if you'd like, follow me via Google Friend Connect and like my blog on Facebook. I will start hosting giveaways when I hit 25 followers on here. And considering that I am a crafter (a knitter and scrapbooker to be exact) AND sell Tupperware AND plan to sell Shaklee AND will be reviewing products from time to time as well (not too often because I don't want this blog to become all about reviews - they can get kind of old when that's all you see in feed reader), there are a LOT of possibilities for giveaways! So, come on in, sit down with a cup of tea (instant with artificial sweetener is my current choice) and have a nice read. Leave some comment love here and there so that I can check your blog out as well!
I can give you a sneak preview without spoilers, I think... there will be new characters, of course, but the ones from Firebrand will still be very much centre stage. Conal and Seth haven’t been idle over the centuries, and they certainly haven’t stayed on one side of the Veil – and it’s their habit of crossing it that gets them into trouble at the beginning of Bloodstone. One incident at the start of the story has terrible consequences, not just for them but for their whole family and clann.
Sounds like the ole’ Sarah we have come to know and love.
When I called in to end my shift I was told that, although they’d known I was out there, the computer did not. My call-sign wasn’t registered with the system, so it was completely blind to me and calls were being routed to everyone else around me instead. This was the first shift I’ve experienced on the FRU where I did absolutely nothing all day long.
Genderless “Healing Heart,Grounded Mind” To Aid :Heart, Base and Crown Chakra Healing Bracelet Genuine Coral, Hematite and Clear Quartz Genderless “Healing Heart,Grounded Mind” To Aid :Heart, Base and Crown Chakra Healing Bracelet Genuine Coral, Hematite and Clear Quartz
So what will it be Conservatives, multiculturalism or freedom of speech?
I'm not going to to try to predict the outcome, but I'd like to share the results of some highly unscientific polling which I have carried out in the pubs and cafés of Cardiff and Newport:
Minho : As for today, I’m still unable to forget.. Probably it has became part of (my/our) memories. The times we spent together in Japan, and all of your sparkly eyes – I have no reason to forget them. Now all I’m thinking of and wishing is to drive with everyone. I want to create the shiniest dreams for our bright future, with everyone.
Imagine you're watching a movie where a married couple can't have a child and must turn to a sperm donor. The kids – now 18 and 15 – are curious about the man that leant his sperm, so they call the fertility clinic and inquire about this person. They meet and are intrigued by this man, inviting him over to meet their parents. Their mom becomes intrigued, too. Add to that the fact that she has been feeling neglected by her partner and sees this man – the man who she sees so much of her son in – as perhaps something more than merely a sperm donor. They decide to hang out a few times; her being a landscape architect starts to work on his yard, and he, an organic farmer/restaurant owner begins to fall in love with her. Ho hum, right? This is the template for what sounds like nothing more than your basic relationship drama with some moments of humor sprinkled in. However, in The Kids Are Alright director Lisa Cholodenko (Laurel Canyon and High Art) and screenwriter Stuart Blumberg take this premise and refrain from the pitfalls of sitcom writing and direction. Here is a film that had every opportunity to be grating, too cute for its own good, and wholly forgettable; but instead, Cholodenko and company create an inviting film that is warm and humane; a wonderfully honest and astutely observed family drama that doesn't go for big moments of drama and conflict, but simply observes the characters and their interactions with each other, and allows the audience to simply observe, too, wishing that we were at the table with them.
Which is why films can seem so dated. It’s not just that it takes two years to make a film and technology changes so fast these days that it’s hard for filmmakers to keep up. It’s also that it is less interesting. A character going to the library is infinitely more interesting than a character sitting at his computer.
Growing up as an aspiring musical artist in Detroit, Ware naturally became part of Motown Records, which was founded in the city as he approached manhood. In the spring of 1967, the Isley Brothers' recording of "Got to Have You Back," which he wrote with Ivy Hunter and Steve Bowden, placed in both the R&B and pop singles charts after its release on the Motown imprint Tamla Records. But his first major hit as a writer came with the Four Tops' "Just Seven Numbers (Can Straighten Out My Life)," co-written with Pam Sawyer and released as a single on Motown, which reached the Top Ten of the R&B charts and the Top 40 of the pop charts in early 1971. He was not working exclusively for Motown, either. During 1971, he collaborated with Ike & Tina Turner, co-writing six songs on their album 'Nuff Said, released that fall on United Artists Records. The album reached the Top 40 of the R&B charts and also appeared in the pop charts. Ware himself was contracted to United Artists, and his self-titled debut album appeared on the label in 1972.
Tikkun Chatzot
I sprayed it and was hungry for the gelato flavors of almond, gingerbread and vanilla.
The total sale is expected to bring in around €1 million.
If local elected officials were obligated to condemn property for a private entity’s development project, this would be an innovation that would make possession of property title purely a matter of political influence. But the bill failed in subcommittee, whose unanimous decision was apparently responsive to the united opposition’s argument: “It is not right for someone with political influence to be able to take someone else’s property thru the exercise of eminent domain so they can develop it. This bill amounts to giving influential parties the ability to select some parcel, say, ‘the widow Brown’s place,’ that might suit their purposes and avoid paying a fair market price for it.”
...finally dropped at my feet
1 cup Small Fresh Mozzarella Balls, Haved OR Regular Mozzarella Cut into 3/4 inch cubes (is it just me or are mozzarella balls gross? I used a brick-- way happy with the result)
1/2 oz - Columbus (60 min)
Meantime, I am looking forward to a more 'normal' week next week that doesn't include time away from the circuit. This last week had a three day retreat, which was useful, but broke the rhythm.
I know, it's pathetic that I stalk furniture, but I do!
So I think I need to set some realistic, but do-able goals for myself for the next three weeks. These include:
Are the two lines one must say
We had dinner at N e g r i l s – my favourite Caribbean restaurant. Well…in the US!
I especially like this necklace because I used my new color combo obsession to make it: I LOVE LOVE LOVE orange with light blue.
2.Add the milk, vanilla, and egg and mix again until smooth.
Saltalamacchia C
Tear down what keeps
There is William T. Braithwaite, a lawyer-student in the Basic Program, who went on to join the Loyola law faculty. While there he somehow managed to get me invited to join him on that faculty (before he escaped to St. John’s College in Annapolis).
Last night there was a dude in the bar who came in with an envelope to give to the bartender, which he said was his "sex tape." Turns out it is a tape of him on "Wife Swap" because he had been telling the bartender girl about it. Remember Ratner from "Fast Times at Ridgemont High?" He looked just like him, only he was hunched over. He told us that his doctor said he has a "lazy back."
Seventy-four percent of the publishers are now fully engaged in implementing digital versions of their magazines and books. 43% of the publishers maintain separate digital operations from their print publishing operations and 67% believe that digital additions will not change from their normal printed publications. For publishers, copyright control is the most dominant management issue. In contrast, consumers insist on the freedom to share content with friends, family and colleagues, and they expect that digital publications can be shared among smart phones, tablets and e-readers. This (like the issues facing the recording industry) suggests an inherent conflict between the subscription tradition of the publishing industry, particularly magazines and newspapers. Consumer insistence in a new right to multi-media access will create substantial change in the way the publishing industry works.
Okay, enough back story. The older three K girls live a fairly loose life style. Kourtney is on-again-off-again with her baby daddy, Scott. Kim is occasionally dragging some hunk in to spend the night—no shame on television. Guess I”m out-moded.
* Sponsorship Manager, “Sponsor Chasing” Manager
do so with compassion
If you do not have a pasta roller, then you might want to invest in one. My client wanted to make it too, since she has never tried some of the things I do. She is an expert Indian roti maker, she can roll it out paper thin if needed. So we both began rolling out the pasta.
To do so, make sure your content draws the reader in, rather than aims to make your points. Your con­tent should encourage collaboration and idea generation, rather than focusing on differences or being adversarial. Think of your community spaces as your living room, where, as Chris Brogan says, all the chairs face each other, not your lecture hall, where the chairs all face you.
We talked about the neighbors. How they're no longer moving, but they're sending their son to boarding school in the Northeast. Which Andrew and I should consider talking about. Apparently.
Some telly programs you should see:
I never really thought much about vaccinations. I got them growing up, my kids at school got them (at least I assume most of them did anyway... in Texas parents have the option whether or not to vaccinate their kids), my friends' kids all got them... I naturally just assumed we would vaccinate Logan, no big deal. Besides, I always thought the only type of people who didn't vaccinate their kids were the ultra crunchy, vegan diet eating, Teva sandal wearing kind. Not judging, just saying.
A direct question, “What is your name?”, would have the following response. “We know it is very important for a person to have a name. A name is like an unique identifier which could be used to call or refer to a person. It is given to a person when he is born.
the MITM and i really appreciate all of your kind words. doing this for mr&mrs cta is one of those things we had to do! i like to think of this as part of our american dna, we help, we try to do the right thing, we are at our core, as a nation, good people. mr&mrs cta have said this over and over again, americans have been kind, generous and good them since the moment they touched down in d.c. just the story of going through customs was an experience beyond anything they expected. they have lived in a police state and not matter what, we have elections and wake up the next day, to the same society, the same rules, the same EVERYTHING, just a different guy or gal at the helm. no military coups, no militia standing guard, no secret police coming to the door because you voted the wrong way! sometimes, we need to be reminded that no matter what, we are damned lucky kids!
Then it grew.
1⁄3 cup all-purpose flour
It’s time for me to think: TODAY, NOW, NOW!
Once gravitational pull (I just made that up) was established, the wine was poured back into the bucket where it was mixed with additives and yeast to help mimic the flavor and chemical reactions that occur when wine is in a barrel. As usual, the cat was extremely helpful during this entire process.
First up we have Mark. He looks much better cleanly shaven. His wife and children (minus Chism) are there. Chris is next, and she looks great in black and white with auburn hair. Her three children are there. Buddy looks SO different with no glasses and no facial hair. He actually looks really cute! And he looks dapper in a suit. His wife and two sons think so too! Yes his two sons are a toddler and a baby, but I could tell they though he looked dapper…it was in their eyes!
I've been looking at this for months and, as usual, I can't decide.
- has a serious and incurable disease;
C) Please come come up with C on your own and leave it in the comments.
Simplicity 4589 Size RS 14-22
Dear ones, you are not alone in your wondering about these things. Yes, sometimes it is just a fluke and you are caught in the crossfire of a spiritual war. At other times you are the target of testing and revealing. At other times it really is personal. How do you discern and how do you combat it? First for discernment; just ask. Ask the holy spirit to lead you to know, to see the real reason behind the attack. Ask him to name it and let you know where it is coming from. Next you need to ask for assistance in combating any real or perceived attack. This help comes in the form of spiritual awareness, spiritual battle, and wisdome. You will not need to discern beyond what you are told. However, with this and with all things you must not allow it to sway you from your mission or your work. You must carry on with what you have been ordained and asked to do. Let the battle continue to rage around you. Let it be and you remain steadfast in what you know that you are being asked to do. Selah.
passing car gave urgency. I jammed every journal and notebook in with the
When you see it in print, the thoughts seem absurd, but we think them and act on them more frequently than we would like to believe. The CDC’s guidelines suggest regular HIV testing for everyone between the ages of 13-64, which is a nice step in the right direction. But, just because you turn 65 or have yet to turn 13 doesn’t mean you’re not at risk of contracting HIV. If you have a pulse and a libido, then you could contract HIV or any STI and being routinely tested as part of an annual check-up or hospital visit is probably a good idea. If we test everyone, then all of the prejudicial questions surrounding who should or shouldn’t be screened for HIV go out the window. We give all children Tetanus shots regardless of our personal beliefs regarding their likelihood of roughhousing and falling on a rusty fence post or nail. Why shouldn’t we do the same for HIV?
Publisher: Zonderkidz; Rev Spl edition (March 6, 2012)
7) If I hated a race, I might campaign to flood all of their countries with millions of people that are not their race, and tell everyone to “mix in”, until no people of that kind were left. If anyone objected, I would scream R-word! at them and get them fired from their jobs.
What kind of a question was that?
Maybe as her RealtorÒ I can find an upgrade condo in her price range.
"Have you seen the KISS coffin? I want to be buried in that!" My fellow KISS fan shouted as I opened my car door.
Abraham Ritchie is a writer as well as the Editor for ArtSlant: Chicago, the creator and administrator of The Chicago Art Blog on the ChicagoNow network and WordPress, and also writes for NewCity. He has previously written about art for Madison Newspapers, Inc.
Do I conform?
On our necks, we sense
The Mona Lisa, aside from being one of the most recognized works in the history of art, is also one of the most widely reproduced works ever. Of course there are numerous Da Vinci posters available, many of which are of The Mona Lisa, available in different hues and a variety of sizes, there are also many other reproductions of the work. For instance, Andy Warhol used the Mona Lisa in the creation of one of his prints, and Botero reproduced his own version of The Mona Lisa, a cartoon-like oil painting. In 1954, Salvador Dali created a self-portrait of himself as Mona Lisa.
There are a number of references to American Indian culture. Descriptive words from their languages; names of places; tribes; and chieftains. My favorites are Tymochtee, Wakatomika, Tontogany and Tawawa. Don’t ask me what any of them mean, I provide the raw data, you can do your own leg-work.
After Karl is attacked by bullies at school and jumps at the opportunity to learn boxing from Max Schmeling. What sparked your interest in the famous boxer?
13.0.0.0.0
18And the nations were angry, and thy wrath is come, and the time of the dead, that they should be judged, and that thou shouldest give reward unto thy servants the prophets, and to the saints, and them that fear thy name, small and great; and shouldest destroy them which destroy the earth.
Texas was quite warm. Like between 96 and 104 degrees f all the time. That's around 38 to 40c. I've been warmer, I've been lots colder. I'm not against heat per se, but 80 ish would suit me fine.
I am not saying that I am under paid. I wish I made more, but I am satisfied with my salary. I work an average of 50-60 hours a week, not including what I do on weekends. That adds up to more than my contract hours. My students are always on my mind. I dream about school. I am always on the lookout for things I can use or ideas I can put to use for my students.
Within the scope of the teachings of Edgar Cayce, it is said that the hormonal system and the endocrine glands are elements of the natural the pathway for the healing of any illness. According to Cayce, these glands are the point of contact among all our three bodies; in these glands, we can experience the soul and spirit, and through them, these elements can exercise influence the physical vehicle. For Cayce, any healing or cure would start in the glandular system, undoubtedly because he believed that all the human activities, all our dispositions, temperament and diversity of nature is the blossom of the action of these glands.
Beach Babe:
"These kids probably have wealthy parents who got suckered into this "new age" education bullbleep. If any of their resumes lands on my desk it's going straight to the paper shredder."
MORGAN: You have two daughters. You have many granddaughters. If one of them was raped — and I accept it’s a very unlikely thing to happen — but if they were, would you honestly look at them in the eye and say they had to have that child if they were impregnated?
And inside of me my heart still says to God please let my two dreams come true for my life. Let it happen for me. Let it come together and help me to trust You because I know that You only have the best in store for me. But please God let the pieces fall into place for me.
The entry fee is £6 for the first poem and £3 for each subsequent entry. Full details and the facility to enter online can be found on The Rialto website.
Just as cool as you please,
Overall-★★★☆☆ -I really like the design and enlargement, too bad they don't show up in my eyes -__- wahh!
18. Your background is now ready for your embellishment. Because the surface is so textured, it can be a tricky task sticking it all together. Lately, I have been using E600 which sadly we do not stock...yet....but it is readily available from most good jewellery making suppliers.
Alas, I am weak. It started out so innocently with just a paper pad here, a paper pad there. Then there was the gluttonous evening where it made sense to fill my cart with enough paper pads to qualify for free shipping. Oh, the joy when the box arrived on my doorstep!
For every voice that they deny.
7:50 p.m. GMT: Africable TV reports that the area around the Djicoroni paratrooper base has been cordoned off, and that a military column was seen moving from the base toward downtown. There is some speculation that the “red berets” (members of the airborne regiment, also charged with protecting Mali’s president) are confronting troops loyal to the junta, but nobody really knows yet what’s been happening.
Still and all -- we're sleeping peacefully at Elder Daughter's house, and looking forward to Christmas! Bouie, too!
I touch their leak
Last year, we tried their Oktoberfest Burger but we haven’t been back since then. Their menu is always adding (and subtracting) menu items so it’s pretty easy to have something different each time you go back.
And while I've had my bad days, I've never really felt the stress and pressure on myself or my marriage that you so often hear about.
no awareness or concern for others around them,
Article 12 After the safety status of prohibited production area is improved and meets the relevant standards, the agriculture administrative department of the people’s government at the county level or above shall timely put forward an adjustment suggestion.
human children, just life
And it was wonderful.
For those following at home, that translates to 1.074 SG.
hard, and unrelenting. However, after being subjected to the boiling water, it
My favorite interior place was the north enfilade. Go to the atrium and look back into the house through the north door all the way back to the stairs. I walked back and forth between the stairs and atrium. Don't doubt me out this.
Two pieces of 4½"x5¾" CS, scored at 1¼", 4" and 4½"
For the marine types, we’ll take it one step further. The bacterial species Thiobacillus denitrificans, Micrococcus denitrificans and the genus Pseudomonas use oxygen as a terminal electron receptor which is why it must be in an anaerobic environment. Which, in marine tanks, is generally deep in the pores of the live rock and deep under the sand (lower than about 3-4 inches) which is why a 6 inch sand bed is recommended. Note that any flow to an area renders this chemical reaction impossible so there are no filters that can allow nitrifying bacteria to grow and flourish. The chemical reaction in these bacteria is as follows:
documentary of this seminal band and another worthwhile
1) The jacket. Put your long puffers away. Though there are moments when I am dying to just put them on to end the misery of the cold, it just doesn’t make sense on May 1. This reminds me of my time in Paris last June when the weather was 50 degrees and overcast every single day. The Parisians wore their trench coats like it was a school uniform and wow, they looked tres chic!
Geek-achu, I call you! Boredom and a camera are a bad combo. Three strand plaits. 2008.
I do ask
-Toxic spider bites no longer necrotize
Was it merely that I dared to take all my children out in public? Or was it that I had them all out of the house and dressed in time for breakfast? We were camping at the time, so it really wasn’t a normal accomplishment. In fact, it was easier to take them to Denny’s than to try to cook breakfast over a campfire while preventing them from falling into it, but she didn’t know that, of
The greatest of these is love: This is another page for the wedding album that I am creating for my brother and his beautiful wife. I am slowing picking away at getting this done but I need pick up the pace a little since they will be coming home for a visit in about 6 weeks!
And I'm afraid that is what I must say right now.
08/25/2010 BUY 0.01 usdchf 1.0260 08/27/2010 1.0299 +3.79
bout a hard drive. I is so not sure bout that
"Come on in, Mom! The water's just right!"
One can of your favorite refrigerated biscuit dough (making 8 biscuits), or mix up a batch of your favorite biscuit dough from scratch
“‘It was fully controlled at all times,’ a law enforcement official said.” NYTimes article said.
"I was in shock that someone was stupid enough to actually do that," said Accomack resident Elizabeth Walraven.
Kai Eide, the former UN special representative to Afghanistan, has been very vocal in his criticism of the Obam Administration’s approach to the Karzai government. He has blamed Obama’s civil and military leaders for the continuous strain in the relationship with Kabul.
Loeb
Instead, start in an unexpected place, and you'll already be one up from about half the submissions. . . . The middle of a heist. Feeding the pigs. At the top of the school's flag pole. Standing on cloud 9 (literally). In a graveyard digging up a grave. At the scene of a murder.
I went to see it with my husband and my in-laws (who are visiting from Oregon right now!) and it was SO good. I was a little hesitant to go see this movie because I had heard that it was a tear-jerker, and I'm not always a fan of sad/heavy movies, even though it's rare that I actually cry during a film. I ended up bawling through a good 1/3 of this movie, but would still very highly recommend it because it's such a beautiful example of how a film can make you feel such intense emotions. Extremely Loud & Incredibly Close embodies the ups and downs of the human experience, and I thought every aspect of the movie was very well-done. (I cannot believe that the kid, Thomas Horn, who played the main character is not nominated for an Oscar because he did an amazing job) The film is nominated for the Oscar for best picture, so if you're like me and you like to try to see some of the nominated movies before the Academy Awards, this is a must-see.
Normally, visual art is by definition not accessible to the sight-impaired. For this project, the artists began by ‘envisioning’ through the ears and hands of a sight-impaired person. Noticing the similarity between the embossed dots of Braille signage and those embossed on a music box cylinder, they created a union of these two seemingly unrelated items in their artwork. The works feature a modified music box which plays Braille letters placed on a music staff to create notes. When the music box within the art is moved, visitors experience unique music.
For me, this year that means not sending an email reminder link to my husband a week before Mother’s Day of my Amazon wish list. (I am seriously picky about gifts, just like my mom, so this system has saved Christian a lot of grief). It means knowing I will not get the ice cream maker even though I changed the priority to “high” last week. The Lord is replacing my visions of homemade sorbet all summer with something better.
Most people will not be particularly shocked to discover that coincidentally that the Government of Wales Act specifically excludes the Assembly from making any laws relating to water supply – hmm – odd that isn't it? The bottom line is that our water resources should belong to the Welsh people, not to Private corporations or to the UK Government.
How to Get Sports Autographs in the Mail
I think it would be wise for Naturally Square to take this approach in our rebranding process. I was thinking we could possibly abbriviate Naturally Square to N2 – thoughts? After our last creative meeting, I decided to incorporate that tagline we discussed “LOL. There is definitely something in the water” and came up with this concept:
Kaya kanina… I went down to get my first cup of coffee. Then I transferred it to my mug. When I went back to my area, I finally sipped my very first precious coffee na hindi three-in-one.
Eat a balanced diet – i.e. the whole animal! Skin, bone and organs have a different amino acid profile to muscle tissue. Ensure you obtain sufficient glycine by simply eating more parts of the animals you choose to eat already. As a starter, search online and you’ll find suppliers of bone marrow, or you local butcher will be able to provide you with marrow bones. Look for organ meats when shopping and make your own pates. A couple of good books to inspire this holistic approach to food:
You look so sad.
gets better left under
In fact, multiculturalism sells itsef as the opposite of tribalism, which, despite its bad press, is actually the default comfort zone for the human monkey mind. Beyond groups of 100 individuals in which everyone is known personally, shit starts getting abstract and we run the risk of ending up enslaved by faceless corporate “persons” acting like they own the joint. Not that we’d ever let such madness get so far…
NOW JUL 3 - 9, 2003 VOL. 22 NO. 44
When the road to the future seems uncertain and dim, when you look ahead and can’t clearly see Him,
Malware and viruses come in a number of different shapes and sizes. What a lot of people don’t realize is that Trojan viruses and malware all have one important thing in common. Specifically, Trojan viruses and malware use a particular tactic to infect a computer. They all prey on a computer user’s desires to find their way onto a system. Through their attachment and affiliation with a computer program that is desirable or perhaps even seemingly helpful to their computer, they get downloaded and start to do their work on the computer’s hard drive.
My drive goes unseen but my consistency will come to light as you others fade to black.
Space Hulk
Media Contact: Rodger Roeser
Did you know that a survey was done on why young people leave the church and one of the top 6 reasons for young people leaving the church is because “Christians demonize everything outside of the church“, check out the other 6, it’s quite interesting!
My sister has been babbling on about some Broadway musical for the last month, and the other day I finally bothered to listen. Apparently, she has been obsessing over the musical Rent.
Tate also starred as his companion in the fourth series of the show.
'Peter Parker' by Simon Monk: it's a painting not a photo - honest!
Trée and Stacie
Today, when my boss lured me away for an office errand, they surprised me with Heavy Machinery. (ok, really is was medium heavy machinery, but still!!!)
So they hate us for our freedom? The First Amendment is controlled by “free speech zones,” and if you think you have unabridged rights to free speech, I suggest you test out that theory on a police officer sometime. The Second Amendment is infringed daily by the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives, and is always one mass shooting away from being attacked and shredded openly by the Executive Branch, Congress, and the media. The Fourth Amendment was nullified by the Patriot Act. The Tenth Amendment has been trampled on for more than 150 years, and the Ninth Amendment isn’t even recognized by constitutional scholars, let alone the barbaric boobs who run the federal government.
Moving on, I’m giving myself a treat today.
And you certainly don’t “get over” the significance and importance of these dates in your relationship.
Ladies, please send me an email so that I can forward it on to the companies above so you can get your goodies!! My email address link is in the sidebar.
Bombardier reports steady progress on both its Global 7000 and 8000 business jets with them on target for service entry in 2016 and 2017, respectively. Wind tunnel testing has been completed and the joint definition phase for the two top-of-the-line models is beginning now. A major expansion of the Global completions and customer interface facility in Montreal should be completed later this year and the top tier suppliers have all been selected.
Remember that there is no map or satellite navigation for life except your heart and soul, although they will also at times get confused and send you down the wrong fuckin’ road. Your constant search for direction and perfection will wear you down so please, please, please don't be afraid to let somebody else drive you through just a little section of your life for a change.
Freedom is the only way yeah,
The media gobbled up Carson’s alarmism. President John Kennedy formed an advisory committee to investigate her claims. Congress held hearings. The Environmental Defense Fund and the Sierra Club brought litigation to pressure the government to ban DDT. Although DDT has never been directly linked to even one human death…, the EPA, which had been established in 1970, banned DDT in 1972. Its use worldwide soon plummeted because the United States and the United Nation’s World Health Organizations would no longer provide financial support for the lifesaving chemical’s use. (…)
Gnu atheists should be presented as uncivil, strident, aggressive, arrogant proselytizers and rigid fundamentalists. Don’t worry about finding concrete examples to support these generalizations. If you absolutely must quote from a gnu, keep it short and divorced from the complex background and context which would only confuse the reader. You’re firmly within the consensus, so you’re on solid ground. At the same time, whenever possible – as when discussing large-scale surveys showing declining rates of belief – present nonbelievers as merely having “doubts” about God. This is perfectly consistent.
The Minnesota Arboretum, offers trees, extentions (for the right $), benches, and bricks for memorial by donation.
Middleson and Oldest have NO idea that tomorrow will be an 8th Birthday Tailgate in honor of Oldest's special birthday and an Ohio Buckeye Football Game. What a great combination! They will both be surprised tomorrow morning. All of my secrets are in place and ready to go! I can hardly wait.
is blooming its breathless death,
At present, there are 85 Gulan madrassahs (Islamic schools) in the United States, and all operate with public funding.
"When the Son of man shall come in his glory, and all the holy angels with him, then shall he sit upon the throne of his glory: And before him shall be gathered all nations: and he shall separate them one from another, as a shepherd divideth his sheep from the goats: And he shall set the sheep on his right hand, but the goats on the left. Then shall the King say unto them on his right hand, Come, ye blessed of my Father, inherit the kingdom prepared for you from the foundation of the world ...
No brush can paint the picture
TA DA! Meet: The Rabbit.
3. Uncle Bernie's Farm (02:09)
All in all, DT5 was pretty good. It probably isn’t my favorite of the series so far, but any plot line that involves the ritual sacrifice of children is intense, so I was pretty engrossed from the jump. If you are of the group of readers who have read the Dark Tower books, but perhaps haven’t gotten as far in the series, I say soldier on. It only gets wackier from here. And if you haven’t read the books, and still aren’t convinced, here is a list of sentences I’ve used in trying to describe the DT series to friends. I anticipate seeing these on Stephen King dust jackets someday.
There is a fine line between creatively eccentric and absolutely nuts. I know this.
That is not true.
I think that's my fastest 10 miles yet.
The point of this post is to help you make the decision that no one can tell you how much your time is worth. Once you make that realization start leveraging resources, like the Internet, to start investing your time. For example, you can start blogging about something you’re passionate about. Over time you build an audience that trust and like you. You can then monetize your audience and see your income go vertical! As more people come to your blog more will buy from you and you don’t have to be there for you to earn that income.
In the end, I was really happy with all the things that I had put in there. It has lots of pictures and visuals, which will make it really nice to look at and see. I even made a timeline of my search and reunion, as well as some of the other really big dates (like my sisters’ birthdays and my parents’ marriage). I put every photo they’ve sent me via email in the book, including the photo that I have of me and my first father (the only photo I have of myself with either one of my parents). I also scanned a note that my first mother sent me once and the birthday card I got from my first father, so I can see their handwriting. Those along with the first two letters from my first mother are the only things that my first parents ever physically gave me. I also included some information and a map of where I was born. I figured it’d be nice to have in there with the extra space (25 pages cost the same as 40 pages so I was going with the 40). And it’s all put together in a nice book that will get here at the end of the month.
Hi Readers! Sometimes I think back on the days of the Soviet Union, when the government would put political dissidents into insane asylums. From our side of the world, that seemed twisted: If you are punishing those against the regime, why not put them in a real prison? But over in the Soviet Union the scenario actually made some (twisted) sense, this way: Since the regime was NEVER going to change, anyone who thought it could or would was literally insane. Delusional! And so to the asylums they were sent.
The papers are quite old DCWV and my snowflake die is a Doo Hickey and the cute little image was given me to play with by this weeks fabulouso sponsor
LS: Write how people talk.
How many matches, I burned through them all
I don't understand why it is so hard to get help.
10. Origin 5.18 (38/29)
50) Obama Formed the Simpson Bowles Commission and Then When Racists Rejected Their Proposals Blamed Obama for not accepting their proposals. Congress should have passed Simpson Bowles and then we would have found out whether or not the President supported their recommendations.
Lagunitas Brewing Co.
Religion–that esoteric, rigid, and despised (by many) word. Even those of us who practice a religion have a hard time admitting it at times. Or at least I do, sometimes. Religion has divided nations/people/churches for centuries. Bloody and hateful battles have been fought in the name of God from the Crusades to the Inquisition to the modern day holy wars still raging in Ireland, South America, and even North America (in a much more subtle manner, of course–we like to fight “politely”). Of course, there are many other countries in which these “holy” wars are being fought, but we don’t hear about them much because they are so common. People are getting lost in the Bermuda Triangle of religion and nobody is talking about it much and what can be done to stop it.
or we would go deaf from the ocean alone
Today, Nate was as happy as could be and flirted non-stop with the female nurses while we waited the 4+ hours for him to go into the OR. (Must be those blue eyes and long eyelashes.)
Thinking about my own situation, I realized that I basically needed to get over myself-accept reality and stop wishing for what was-or what should be. Perhaps this also applies to the life insurance industry. We have been content to maintain the status quo, tweaking existing products and relying solely on a shrinking distribution model that isn’t reaching the majority of middle America.
Oh geeze, do I get to count “getting the call” in late March last year for getting accepted in An Honest Lie Vol 3, and then the actual publication in October? Not to mention being accepted in The Literary Lab's 3rd annual anthology, Variations on a Theme, expected publication date 3/15/12.
Cheering for the Pack is tough, because I'm a life-long Bears fan. But I'm getting on board to cheer for the favorite team of my Mom and my Grandma Host. I sure do hope they get the game in heaven for Grandma.
Here is a picture of the polish just before I took it off. This is day 7. First, you can see the bed sheet marks on my ring finger - this is the slow drying time I was talking about in my last post. Also you can really see the tip wear on the middle finger and the ring finger. There is some chipping at the tip of the middle finger (top of the picture).
Have you ever thought of a brilliant idea in your sleep, only to wake up and find that you can’t remember it?
06 Candy O
“They are building a robot,” he replied.
Humanitarian Aid: Material and financial aid to the poor and needy given by the church. This is such a crucial mission that, according to British LDS records, almost 2% of the church’s income goes to humanitarian aid.
Her mouth was straight and serious,
3. Research breed traits. Buying a puppy should not be based on which dog is the cutest, or which breed you always thought looked nice. Take the time to thoroughly research these traits so that you can make an informed decision. Some breeds shed more than others, while some breeds have known behavioral issues. For example, Great Pyrenees dogs are very beautiful and popular, but they are bred for livestock guarding and not apartment living.
Find out after the weekend.
then I would not kill him,
Pushing the button activates the laser. Pushing it again shuts it off. The button head is recessed deep enough in a guard that it's highly unlikely the laser will be activated accidentally during pocket carry, especially if a proper holster is used. On the other hand, switching it on on purpose is easy and natural.
Age no bar, sex no bar, lack of IP background no bar....
Werther is often cited as being Massenet's greatest work and you can see why - it's a magnificent score, opulently fragrant late romantic music, and just so wonderfully French. Colours and smells, enchantment, sentimentality, lightness, passion, indulgence. But there's a an air of seriousness and High Art to this score too, something absent in the rest of his operas, its presence probably explicable because its libretto is drawn from Goethe. Really though this is all pretence and wishful thinking - nothing could be further from Massenet's talents than Teutonic profundity - he is a genius of orchestral shadings, delicious suavity, finely delineated emotional states, ravishment of the senses. Behind the refinement and surface shimmer though there are always burgeoning erotic undertones, and like Strauss at heart he's all sensuality and sleaze.
As we left Cahersiveen we made our way to our lunch in Waterville. As we were driving along the road, we could see from the bus Valentia Island. This island was the eastern terminus of the first transatlantic cable and was also the place where the Marconi Company placed their westernmost wireless station in Europe.
Acts 9:21-22
Over the last few years, I’ve searched for documents that outline best practices for world language teachers in hopes of finding that secret formula, that magic bullet that will transform me into the best language teacher I can be.
As the trainers splash about in the water in the streets, the street-lamps get these halos around them, and the houses and the lights are reflected in the street.
what time I'm to meet up with you
Urg. I’ve crippled myself just typing that out.
All comments will be moderated from here on out so that the agents can play their hands in secret. They'll have until March 14th at 12pm EST when comments will be published and winners will be revealed,
One last thing: Remember the Shutterfly book I was working on before I left for Atlanta? It arrived while I was there. Here it is (click on Full Screen to see it better):
- Hymn pages (music sheets, dictionary pages, book pages)
Me: ”Is she (roommate) expecting you?”
Get another 4 wheel drive (or a bus)
Quite a wide scope here from fancy folded cards, origami figures to handmade flowers made from folding, let you imagination and folding run wild.
Another time, this time walking through the woods near a battle site between my cousin's and my ancestors and the encroaching white people, I saw an owl in a low-hanging branch. As I was bounding down the trail, I noticed the tiny bird and stopped dead in my tracks (so to speak...). Our eyes locked and I spoke to the owl; s/he waited a few moments, and then flew off. The next morning I was told my grandfather was near death.
What is even more admirable is that, unlike so many people who read nowadays solely for exam courses or for other practical purposes, she reads for pleasure – in story, in shaped sentences, in the magic of a word or an image. It’s more than 70 years since Walter Benjamin wondered whether the children of the future would enjoy “the exacting silence of a book”. Since then a whole generation has been turned outward, away from interior exploration, by iPods, Playstations and MTV. Some can’t even contemplate writing an essay without the sound of music or the flicker of images in the background. There is something faintly scandalous and wonderfully anachronistic about Ms Battersby’s pursuit of literary pleasure in a culture too often characterised by a search for mere sensations.
Montero is expected to become a middle-of-the-order power hitter – exactly what the Mariners need. These types of players don’t come around very often, and the Mariners took the opportunity to grab one with six years of team control before free agency. To do this, they had to move a premium player – and that was Pineda.
Lowles is campaigning to get the EDL classified, by the Home Office, as an ‘extremist right-wing organisation’. Why? What exactly does he want from this extreme classification? It is simple (though Lowles cannot be too honest about this just in case he comes across as the Stalinist that he is).
This season's Solstice (Summer in the Northern hemisphere, Winter in the Southern), occurs at 17:16/5:16pm UTC on June 21, 2011. That's 13:16/1:16pm where I am, in the Eastern Time zone, under Daylight Savings Time (UTC-4).
Rachel kept her eyes on the computer. Not that there was anything that interesting on the screen. Just news about Lady Gaga "I never asked you to."
And tears
Several years ago I was living in a small back room outside an old wooden house in a suburb full of beautiful gardens and friendly people. My room was long and thin, with wooden floorboards and windows all down one side, glass french doors that opened up outside the house, onto an old back veranda and garden, overhung with star Jasmine that dropped flowers everywhere and left me perpetually relaxed. -(Jasmine oil stimulates the production and release of the nueropeptide GABA) I always slept with the doors and windows open, it was so beautiful in the rain and mornings!
Pretty Pinholes
“We wouldn’t send it to the accountant,” I said. “We’d leave it in the bungalow for the ringmaster to find so he’d think she had mislaid it during one of her visits.”
I love how this silver leather patchwork bodysuit plays with the shape of the body, and was paired up with the crystal constallation headdress by Stephen Jones and pink feather coat with the American Flag. The Shoes are Giuseppe Zanotti.
And so, the lost manuscript for Hemingway’s loving tribute to his peers, Fitzgerald and the like, is lost forever.
The inside of the van was soaked... but all my change was still in the van and I didn't think I had left anything of value in there (no ipods or cell phones or anything) so I just did a big heavy sigh and went to pick them up from under the overhang.
clapping - you have mastered this, and it is so delightful
I didn’t really know what to expect before I watched The Voice. I knew the basic formula but not much else, I thought that it was just going to be X Factor BBC style. But I was pleasantly surprised. The idea of turning chairs is fresh enough to differentiate it from the competition and really modernise the talent show idea. I was also impressed with the coaches, each of whom seems to look for something different in a contestant. Will I Am seemed the weakest link to me, although there is every possibility that he will improve in the coming weeks, he seemed to be looking for someone a bit different, with a new sound. Jessie J was significantly stronger, she was looking for someone who had the emotional attachment to the music, who felt every note. Tom Jones was reasonably strong as a coach and seemed to be focused on finding someone with an amazing voice. Danny was was also quite a good coach although I was dubious beforehand and he seemed to be focussing on the complete package. But which of these approaches is best? We’ll have to wait to find out.
ENSEMBLE ACTING
53 Cold Comfort Farm – Stella Gibbons
My beib is out of town golfing again, I'm alone, forgotten and abandoned... emptying my secret candy stash and so on. Luckily my cousin was in town this week, so thanks Stina for snapping these shots the other day
Thats when it happens- Something in side says “Oh Well, we will start our diet again on Monday” the rest of the week is a write off as you eat everything in site because Monday you diet starts for real this time!
While looking for a cheap flight to LA, I came across a site that listed a RT flight from Boston to Lima for $420. The only thing going through my mind at that point was: The Inca Trail. I was ecstatic. I made a call and bought the ticket.
I wrote in my previous article that the current Browns front office had never taken a quarterback in the first round of a draft, and I believed that streak would continue with our second first round pick at 22. I was aware of the Browns interest in Oklahoma State quarterback Brandon Weeden, but I believed if he was taken, it would have been with the Browns second round pick at 37. Some speculated he would still be available, but with Brandon being the next best quarterback on the board, and the NFL being a quarterback driven league, the Browns did not want to risk losing him.
The Lord has told us that it is the duty of every husband and wife to obey the command given to Adam to multiply and replenish the earth, so that the legions of choice spirits waiting for their tabernacles of flesh may come here and move forward under God’s great design to become perfect souls, for without these fleshly tabernacles they cannot progress to their God-planned destiny. Thus, every husband and wife should become a father and a mother in Israel to children born under the holy, eternal covenant.
diving
Then add melted ghee/clarified butter in a stream as you keep incorporating it into the batter. Add the vanilla extract at this point.
Surveys on NBC.com make me visit the site less often
All of my kids, with the exception of Finn, are vaccinated according to the recommended immunization schedule. I never questioned it early in my mothering career. Just like having baby boys circumcised, vaccinating per the recommended schedule was just what you did, end of story. But as time went on and I had more children and my whole perception of modern mainstream maternity, postpartum, and infant care began to change, I began questioning more and more. By the time I was pregnant for the third time, I was ready to throw in the towel on medical/hospital-based maternity care and opted for midwifery care and a homebirth instead. Lo and behold, we found out we were expecting twins, though, so my dreams of a homebirth were postponed until the next time around. By the time I was pregnant the fourth time, with Lilah, I was going to have a homebirth come Hell or high water, and by then I was really questioning circumcision and vaccines. We opted to go ahead with most of the recommended vaccines for Lilah, though I refused the rotovirus vaccine, feeling very distrustful of newer vaccines that did not appear to have a proven safety record. We’ve also never done flu shots on any of our kids.
Today is the last day of the Memorable Seasons Sketch-a-Thon, you do have until the 31st to complete any sketches and load them in the gallery. Here is the sketch I created for today:
He will wear that ‘guilty crown’.
- An upcoming episode of Glee will deal with domestic violence while the 20th and 21st episodes will feature a body swap plot as well.
80) would you like to help me with my self esteam?
The retrospective exhibit, A Pristine Vision, has finished it's tour in Germany.
"These are real barriers that we have to get over in society if we're really going to accept that we should be treating pain and putting more money into it."
You've heard of Oprah's book club right? Well, Sophia and Marcus have their own little book club . I let them pick the books they want to read during the week. Here are their picks for this week. You can check out their past choices by looking at the "weekly reading" labeled entries.
#2 - Judith
- being able to just hang up your full garbage bag off a tree on the sidewalk in front of your house and knowing that “they” will pick it up and it will be gone mañana. (as opposed to what we did in Vancouver: keeping all garbage locked up in a shed and having to arise at 7:30 am on one particular day – which changes every month – and taking it to the street – all to avoid making the bears dependent on your garbage). In case you are curious, the recycling I need to take with me in a car, and dump it in one of many recycling stations you can find on pretty much every other street.
NFC is quickly becoming a regular feature in today’s smartphones. RIM was not the first to implement NFC in their devices, but they’re definitely making it a standard in its future ones. Incorporating RIM’s security and acquisitions they’ve made, we could see RIM being a leader in the NFC field when it comes to payments, electronic entry to buildings, etc etc. Even through its new peripheral device – the BlackBerry Music Gateway announced at BB World 2012, RIM is showing that they are serious about the potential of NFC when it comes to sharing content, pairing devices and much much more.
In response to the government’s plan to cut central wage bargaining, Unite's Len McCluskey said: "All this will do is drive workers to the better paid regions, leaving large parts of the country without the professionals essential to sustain local services."
During his training, Tuitele plans to take several classes at Hawaii and later hire an agent during his preparations for the NFL.
Happy eating!
military..retired people..actors..travel journalist..secret agent..politician..author..designer..event organiser..lottery winner..food critic..dancer..muscian..athlete..researcher..pilot..flight attendant..cabin crew on a cruise...archaeologist..wildlife photographer...spokesperson...time traveller...
I need to buy some smaller envelopes to put in with the cards for people to be able to send their donations to Reece's Rainbow.
Let me tell you about a couple of variations I did. I did not have ranch dressing or alfredo on hand. Next time I'd like to use alfredo and no ranch (trying to avoid the MSG). But what I did have was the Campbell's Cheddar Cheese soup so I used almost a whole can of that instead. I also only used 1 1/2 cups of cheese as I found it to be plenty! It is very cheesy.
The ones I downloaded were "Coney Island Washboard," "Happy Fat Annie" and "Teddy Bear's Picnic," a demonic stomp that I shamelessly ripped off for the arrangement of my own "Potatoheads' Picnic." There's three or for other kazoo, banjo and washboard-heavy tracks here I'll probably nab in the future.
10. Fast Track 3
Well, at any rate, I hope to release my EP album before this summer and then I'd like to perform live on stage as auhm. It'll be my honor to communicate well with each other through auhm's lively soundscape. Thanks.
Well, something like that. And after it happened, the next time someone was up on the ladder, someone commented:
Ultimately, the cops busted her. But I guarantee you half the people who read the initial report still believe it.
When planning for our Rehearsal Dinner, it was important to Will and I to include not only our bridal party, but also our extended families, as we wanted to share this special dinner with all our loved ones. That meant we needed to find a venue that could accommodate our sixty person guest list :) EEK!
When Mom died in 2007 at age 92 she’d owned a knitting shop in Inglewood, California, for more than 30 years. She sold yarns, buttons, needles and pattern books, designed her own patterns, finished sweaters for people, and held almost-daily coffee klatches: Her customers would sit around her big table, knit and crochet, laugh, gossip, and share stores about their jobs, children and lives. “The Tyrolean Model” was one of her specialties, and the picture in the scrapbook page above — I made the scrapbook for her 90th birthday — was cut out of a Spinnerin pattern book. She licensed the design to Spinnerin in, I think, the 1970s.
Man seeks "the truth": a world that is not self-contradictory, not deceptive, does not change, a true world--a world in which one does not suffer; contradiction, deception, change--causes of suffering! He does not doubt that a world as it ought to be exists; he would like to seek out the road to it. (Indian critique: e.g. the "ego" as apparent, as not real.)
Paper Piecing, Use some kind of paper piecing on your card or project this week. Stamp something and use some Designer Paper to piece an element of the stamp or paper piece your Background. In addition NO ribbon and only one embellishment is allowed.
Don’t wait for a rainy day to discover that your homeowners or umbrella insurance policies don’t fit your home business insurance needs. Read your policy. Talk to your insurance agent. Pay at least $500 a year to buy a business owners policy so you and your pricey computer can sleep well at night.
In South Africa, the whites built 15 new classrooms for blacks every working day, every year. At 40 children per class it meant space for an additional 600 black students every day!!!
Munnar can be visited all the year round. But it is better to avoid the monsoon months of Kerala which are June/July. During winters, i.e. December/January, the weather is extremely cold there, so it is better to carry pair of woolens with you.
1. Wash and soak toor dal for 2-3 hours. Boil coarsely adding a little salt and set aside.
OK, we choose bust. I’ll explain in a minute.
Synopsis from Goodreads: "Three angels- Gabriel, the warrior; Ivy, the healer; and Bethany, the youngest and most human- are sent by Heaven to bring good to a world falling under the influence of darkness. They must work hard to conceal their luminous glow, superhuman powers, and, most dangerous of all, their wings, all the while avoiding all human attachments.
I wore him on my back today too. It still takes me a while to get him just right but I’m getting better. I managed to make blueberry muffins this morning (Itty Bitty was pleased) and rice and beans for dinner and do a little laundry. The first time he wet while in the sling because I had him in it too long and he roused from sleep. And the second time I removed him because my “Potty Sense” was tingling. Unfortunately, after I got him off my back I paused to ask Daddy Man something because he looked odd (turns out he’d hurt himself while bending down…lung in rib situation) instead of doing what I had been planning to do. Subsequently I missed a gigantic wee. Dagnabbit! Mini Moose has a bigger bladder now and can hold more so it can be impressive if he hasn’t gone in a while. I am counting it as a half catch, because I would have got it if I hadn’t gotten distracted.
We'll start the ball rolling this week with our own query letters. This is a letter I sent to agents for my last completed novel. It received several requests for fulls and partials, probably because I had the letter critiqued by Saundra Mitchell:
Also released shortly is a Hollywood version of Edge of Darkness, which older people may remember as a brilliant UK television series from the 1980s. Sadly this new version stars Mel Gibson, an actor in whom I have lost a lot of faith over the years and early reports don’t sound promising as for starters the ending has been changed. There is still a temptation to see the film, although I think buying the box set of the original series and re-watching that is probably the better bet.
EVEN A STOPPED CLOCK TELLS THE RIGHT TIME TWICE A DAY
When I learned that there was some ghost writer creating the books from the TV show & writing as Richard Castle, that the actor went to book signings & no one knew who was actually putting pen to paper, I was fascinated. When I picked it up & realized that it read just like the show watches, I was very pleased – and when I realized that unlike TV, Heat & Rook (Rook – Castle – get it?) actually get together, I was very very happy. If you like the TV show, the books are a must IMO.
The day I placed her in the home was the day my heart stopped beating, its chambers constricting in a pain unbearable. Each day I visit in hopes that she breathes life back into me, just enough to last me until recognition shows itself again. Most days I am the new neighbor in town she befriends. She inquires my name and asks if I have family. She tells me I have a handsome face and hopes that I don't think her too forward for telling me so. She tells me my face reminds her of someone, but she just can't remember who, and that it brings her comfort and she doesn't know why. Each day the same conversation is had. Each day tears are shed turning my puddle into a lake into a river.
This is what I want our love to be like at the end of our lives. I love you and I can’t wait to start living this life and love with you.
Since a good sponge-cake, according to Hannah Glasse in 1747, should be beaten for an hour, it's not hard to see why the purchase of such a cake, without the repetitive strain-inducing labour, should be such a pleasant prospect.
Douglass argues that Calvin makes no remarks in his many works that would contradict her reading of the implications of his classification of a woman’s silence in church as “indifferent.” She notes that the “only mention of women’s subjection I have found is in the context of submission of the church to the Word of God” (160).
This is a step by step process. We have learned in the past that if we ascend too soon, or are out of sync with an ascending age, we fail . . . because we are not ready for the energy. We learned this the hard way in Egypt and Atlantis. Everything needs to be synchronized on the same page and on the same bandwidth. From our vantage point, all is going very well.
And with that we move on to the west.
This is another super quick post with a super easy card!
While my band was too tight I was always hungry, struggling to keep food down, and PBing more than is safe.
When I met him, he had to be constrained to a crate when the Missus was at work, due to his penchant for chewing on absolutely everything. When the Missus eventually got me over to her apartment via a clever ‘printer not working’ ruse (easiest way in the world to land a geek; pretend you are having computer issues) and I began spending more time over there, it did NOT take long to get him out of that crate. Simply put, I let him know who the alpha dog was, and the alpha dog did not take kindly to his leather shoes being gnawed upon. The cool part was that Dudley not only understood not to chew on every damn thing in the house, but he also immediately took to being freed from his cage. Granted, he never became a good watchdog (he would get scared if you dropped a fork, flying into a barking fit that eventually ended up with him running into a corner and peeing on the floor) but he definitely took reign of his kingdom. Even though he pranced around it.
I'd love to hear what's worked for you! My list is by no means fabulous or complete.
According to Mr Justice Newey a reasonable person would understand the deed which set up the trust to be transferring all the assets listed in a schedule to the deed, which included the paintings, to the trustees. As such, they no longer represented partnership property. Nor were they "fixtures" which could be said to be included in the lease to the Earl of Cardigan of Severnake Lodge, the house in which they hung.
It has been altered by the socio-economics and the art and design of the times!
We stand upon the threshold of a complete rejection of the concept of individual freedom.
MT: If you could choose any Festival to perform at, where would it be and why?
When you conserve energy in your home, you can maintain oractually improve the quality of your life. The first benefit of conservation is that your electric bill is less – giving you more money to spend on other things.
Then for the background, I grabbed my extra large circle punch from Fiskars, and made a mask. I placed the circle I punched where I wanted it, and used my repositionable Tombo tape to secure it. Then, I pulled out some of my $1.00 stamp pads from Studio G and﻿ some Stampin' Up Perfect Plum, as well as some Broken China Distress Ink, and more Tuxedo Black. I used sponge daubers and went from lightest to darkest to create my night sky. I did LOTS of coats of ink, because things dry very differently, as I'm sure you have found for yourself.
Not much of a dream, I know. There were no flying monkeys or pork knights or lusty babes in it. Except for her. She pretty much still is a babe. She was a babe back in high school, and, according to her profile on the Book of Faces (I looked just to verify and stuff *shifty-eyed*), she's still Babe-a-licious. Schwing!!!
The bottom corner of the windshield cracked in a soft ball sized circle
I hope you don't mind me using your pen! I am the Easter Bunny's helper, Oofle the Bunny. I am from Bunny Land where I am training to be an Easter Bunny! Sorry about my handwriting, guys!
Singh S, Mohanty A, Joshi YK, Deka D, Mohanty S, Panda SK. Mother to child transmission of hepatitis E virus infection. Ind J Pediatr 2003; 70: 37-39.
The inarguable imprint of Sukarno upon his precious young charge lies in “gotong royong”.
Our dipsticks are located in Washington, DC.
Isn’t that your soul ?
Are these two things incompatible? I don't think so. You might say, well, Sarah, putting these two things together basically just means that your only problem with gay marriage and the main reason you would vote yes on something like proposition 8 all boils down to a definition issue. You would basically be right. I believe people are people, I believe marriage is sacred, and I believe if you have a feeling towards anyone anyone ANYONE that is anything less than love, you have some work to do, and that's what you should be worrying about.
For seeing me as worthy to make you my God
Every single fuck up, embarrassing faux pas and humiliating thing you have done in your life, played out over and over again for the rest of eternity in front of a laughing and pointing crowd until the only option is to flay your own face off so no one will recognise you and your shame, but this being hell, it always grows back the very next day. Try that one on for size, huh?
In conjunction with my upcoming show Trav S.D.’s American Vaudeville Theatre 15th Anniversary ExTRAVaganza, I’m doing a number of special posts to orient audiences and readers in the twin realms of my own vaudeville past (such as it is) and that of vaudeville in general.
One night as Kata left the prayer meeting, a group of men grabbed and bound him. They dragged him along the paved road, finally stopping in a clearing where 30 others, with clubs and sticks in hand, waited to join the attack.
Readers, a few questions:
2012: .217/.265/..304 with 0 homers
Yeah, I know what you're thinking. Totally off-topic. I agree. It's just that I didn't want to leave you on such a down note. With all the improvements in recording technology in the seventy-three years since little gem was consigned to wax, it just doesn't get any better than this.
Both chefs are ex-Torito. Carlos was a one-time chef at the Kensington market tapas bar, and Fransisco his sou-chef. So Carlos’ next gig is Inigo, a churrasqueira specializing in chicken, and a host of side dishes.
John Smith’s Grand National Record: 2009 Hear The Echo (Fell after 30th).
At least in last night’s game against the Milwaukee Brewers No. 1 draft pick and 11th overall from last year’s draft left handed pitcher Jed Bradley, Anthony Hewitt looked like the better No. 1 pick that he was for the Phillies back in the 2008 draft.
At the end of that first season we had a little chat. It may very well be that my kid never becomes a superstar, but as long as he is having fun…..
And the violets are dead,
3 Rolled up Socks
On one occasion a teacher suggested: 'If your slave has been really, really naughty you could hit them with the soft end AFTER YOU'VE USED IT.'
During the election campaign we heard a lot about 'cleaning up politics'. But what faith can we have in Dave if he's a product of this PR-obsessed system? Given that the expenses scandal has left us all so fed up, Dave will have little option but to make some serious changes to the way British politics operates if he ever wants to gain the trust of the electorate. This does present him with an opportunity to turn his back on the type of strategy that sees spin doctors calling the shots, and which sees opponents demonised rather than engaged with.
This stout poured a dark opaque black color with pecan brown highlights around the edges. It was capped off by a small dark brown head that left some incredible lacing for the entire beer. The smell is a combination of roasted malt, bitter chocolate, currants, and a certain nutty quality to is as well. The flavor profile follows the nice very nicely with upfront flavors of dark roasted grain, bitter chocolate, dark fruits, coffee, and anise. There is a hint of sweetness and smoke lingering on the back of the palate as well. I don't get any alchohol burn either from the 9%. The mouthfeel is very thick and chewy, but it still manages to render itself very smooth. Someone needs to tell this beer it has 9% ABV in it, because the way it drank I would have had many more of these.
Today I fell upon this little doozy. Brings me to the ultimate question, where did the human trait of common sense go? We live about 20 minutes from a little town called Angola, New York. Look it up on a map, it's pretty damn small.
See? No place for camera.
the waters of life
Friday - Desk in the morning. Then went home. Still feel Siiiiiick.
Jintan: Oh…
During my quiet time I am studying the different women of the Bible. I got a book of devotionals and such from a sweet lady at my church right after I graduated high school. I've started and stopped this book several times. I always come back to it, because it's fascinating to study these women and to see what role they had. It's also refreshing to be able to relate to them somehow and to learn from them.
The contagion of Wukan appears to have spread to the south and west, across the border into Vietnam.
5. The Guy Who Just Got Dumped: dear god, he may be the worst. He just got dumped by his girlfriend or fiance and he’s looking to drown himself in Jagermeister and find sympathy. He will say things like, “Hey, if you were single, you would date me, right?” Or, “Hey pretty lady, would you say that I’m decent looking, I have a friendly face, right?” You can hear him muttering in the corner about how he “thought she was the one.” His drink of choice is Jagermeister shots only, he’s ready to end the night in the bottom of the bottle. Stay away from him, unless you are a counselor.
Blunderbuss if you look up the meaning is one of two things that can both be applicable here. Blunderbuss is one, a short musket that is used to scatter shots at short range and two a clumsy person that is often regarded as dumb or stupid. In terms of this album, the songs seem to scatter at a short range for the listener addressing many issues, while at the same time maybe that’s how Jack felt when expressing himself lyrically when writing these songs. Perhaps this was Whites intention when creating the album, but regardless Blunderbuss is a statement from Jack White, one that can fascinate even the most casual listener. Blunderbuss debuted at number one the US Billboard top 200 charts and across and went to number one in Canada, the UK and Switzerland.
Families are broken; more children than ever grow up without both parents;
Have you heard the news …. Cornish Heritage Farms is back!!!!!!! Yes I know they have been back for a few months now and you can already purchase digital stamps on their web site. But as from this Thursday 19th April, you will also be able to purchase rubber stamps too.
Now that the good weather is here, I love being outside gardening, grilling and playing with my boys. Traditionally I’d have to stop what I was doing if I wanted to talk on the phone. Thankfully the VTech Multitasking Phone System LS6475-3 has a headset that I pop on over my ear and off I go.
You will start your last row as normal until you get to the second corner...
The border between Mexico and Belize is a slow moving river called the Rio Hondo where alligators lurk and drooping trees drag finger tips in the murky green water. Crossing the steel bridge spanning the gap between the two countries Raul and I are kept busy trying to rid ourselves of yet another unwanted straggler. This one is trying to convince us to give him our passports and $10 each so he can get us our entrance stamp for Belize. I am almost deceived by his friendly charm, singsong Caribbean accent and helpful demeanour – but by now I’ve seen too many of his kind to fall for his tricks. I’m trying to think of a polite way to tell him to leave us alone, Raul on the other hand is having nothing to do with it and he abruptly tells the guy where to
Colleen Graham, a professional bartender who writes the cocktails column for About.com, promises "Ninety creative cocktails and inspired shooters" -- and that they are -- in her subtitle, What she delivers, however, also includes 10 pages of how to set up a "tequila bar" that, in reality, can be the basis of any good home bar. She also provides variations on every recipe in the book, a true bonus.
No excuse needed, thank you very much, as you and I both know exactly why he left me for you — and it has nothing at all to do with my looks or your looks. (And since this is coming from Marilyn, I think this is tacit acknowledgment that the resemblance really is striking…)
Pain. Pelvic and abdominal pain – 95 %
A few months ago, at a council meeting, when residents were complaining at the withdrawal of funding for school lollipop crossings, Brian Coleman went off on a Grade 1 rant about the appalling inconvenience of temporary traffic lights, and he vowed to ban them in the borough, forcing companies to replace such arrangements with hat doffing labourers holding stop and go signs, bowing when the Coleman saloon approached, and waving him through with a cheery smile and an obedient salute.
Christine had had a hard life. She had finally found a man that she loved very much. My younger sister couldn’t make it to her wedding because she had a card game that had been scheduled for several weeks. My mother also couldn’t make the wedding due to an important engagement she had at the Elks Club. The wedding was one of the most important days in Christine’s life. Since no one else from our side of the family showed, Christine asked me to walk her down the aisle to give her away.
The Celluloid Highway (Shaun is a super smart blogger and every post he shares is a wealth of information and insight. Paying him a visit is an enriching experience, he’s remarkable.)
Linking up with Lee over at Freshly Pieced, so pop on over and look at all the lovelies worked on this week.
Napkins - Pier 1
There are a couple of things about this story that seem just a wee-bit fishy to me.
And from By Terry... I discovered these two from my daughter...
has thrown her support in favor of this “evolving” concept. Not only did she endorse the President’s views and embrace his rationale, she offered her own perspective in response to the related questions, “Do you believe that religion and the idea that you can support gay marriage should be separated? And how do you grapple with the idea that you support gay marriage as a Catholic?”, by stating that,
Mearls: The biggest thing is making it OK for one character to own a particularly encounter. If the wizard casts sleep and KOs a group of six kobolds, that's OK. In the next encounter, the rogue might sneak up on the kobold shaman and gank him, or the fighter blocks a doorway and takes down a wave of attackers. Same goes for characters with good social abilities, and so
With everything that has happened over the past two days or so, Shannon has become disheartened. This causes her to not want to do much of anything, so she just stares out the window. She wants to see some familiar faces; Marc, Penn, even her grandparents who’ve she’s been thinking a lot about lately. But because of her current status with the Marshals service and the witness protection program, she doubts that the Marshals will allow anyone to visit her because that could pose a security risk, due to the fact that the New World Power could use these guests as a way to figure out where Shannon is and finish what they started. With those who are entered into the witness protection program, they are essentially removed from their old lives, meaning that they can’t meet up with old friends, family, or associates. She doubts that the Marshals even contacted anyone regarding her health or what is going on with her. If they did contact anyone, it’ll either be her grandparents because they are her only known relatives or Marc, who she uses as an emergency contact while she stays in L.A. As she thinks of this, she hopes that Marc is alright.
* Retail Sales are expected to have increased by 0.5% (seasonally adjusted) in March after rising 1.0%% in February. This is a broad measure of retail sales, not just activity at the malls. Most significantly, it includes auto sales, which while recovering, were weaker in March than they were in February. Excluding autos, retail sales are expected to have been up 0.7% after rising 0.7% in February. While the numbers are adjusted for seasonal variations like the number of shopping days, they are not adjusted for inflation. As such, some of the “strength” in retail sales will probably come from gas stations, and not due to a sudden rise in the number of people eating hot dogs off the rollers and drinking 44oz fountain drinks.
Dragon clouds so high above
Malt is from Tracy Reese's Spring 2011 collaboration with Sally Hansen. I acquired five of the polishes from her set and one from Prabal Gurung's (which I wound up gifting to Chelsea), and Malt is the third one I've gotten around to trying. PAH-THETIC! Anyway, this shade is still floating around on Amazon and eBay if you're interested in it ... or *cough* you can leave a comment on this post with your e-mail address and we can arrange a swap (if you're in the contintental U.S.) I'm kind of on a time crunch, so this offer is valid for the next 48 hours. *cough*
Trying to juggle college tuition and rent, young Audra Perez seeks a fast fix to her financial woes by auditioning as a stripper for the Hoochie Coochie Club. What she didn’t expect was to actually be chosen! Barely a few months into her new job, she becomes acquainted with a mysterious, distinguished gentleman by the name of Darren Von Eldon, and they secretly begin dating against club rules. Then one passionate night at his beach house changes Audra’s life forever.
And what’s a night driver to do when the workshop is closed, the defect isn’t serious, and there’s people lined up to be driven home? Naturally, the 24-hour servo is the handy-dandy patchit shop, and a roll of duct tape is just the thing to hold a wobbling wing mirror straight. Next time you load your bags into a taxi boot, check out the corners. Like as not there’ll be a couple of elastic straps, the kind with hooks on the ends, tucked away somewhere. You can hold a cab together with octo straps, and if there’s more luggage than the boot can easily contain, just pile it in and use the straps to hold the boot lid down on the trip.
The course started out through a shopping center, then out onto some mostly shaded residential roads. There is a couple of lakes in this neighborhood, and a very popular golf course (Lochmere). So we had a big downhill going towards the first lake. The good news is that I hit the first lake and saw the first mile marker in 5:42. The bad news is that the mile marker was only placed at 0.77 miles in. My actual time on the first mile was more like 7:07, which is perfectly reasonable. Perhaps too fast, even. Eventually they spaced the mile markers more properly, as the course overall was accurately measured.
WHO SATISFIES YOUR DESIRES
formed, essentially to tour in promotion of the debut album with all the musicians being from Belfast. Most had previously played in local bands except drummer Davy Bates. He was the sticks-man for legendary Belfast band ‘Sweet Savage’ (immortalized when Metallica covered their ‘Killing Time’ opus as the ‘B side of ‘The Unforgiven’).
Lung and Tail Risotto.
BEFORE ---
for everything.
This month two projects were chosen
Who was attacking the Israelites? The Philistines.
Basically, we had three main issues going on. The first was the worst case of colic anyone has ever seen (anyone we know and all the docs we took her to). She screamed when she wasn’t eating or sleeping (which was very little). And she didn’t nap unless she was in motion, so I had to walk her in the stroller or bounce her while sitting on an exercise ball all the time…and I mean ALL the time. This took four months to go away.
Moving the ice shanty over the snow was easy. Clearing a space on the ice, where the water was deep enough, I cut a large hole in the ice. Moving the ice shanty, aligning the hole in the floor with the hole in the ice was simple enough. I banked the ice house with snow to keep out the cold wind.
Heaven forbid any of us have to actually learn or think anymore. Or, whatever happened to relying on the good, ol’ Holy Spirit? Or our lives to prove/reflect the existence of God?
God made sex a good thing and the best kind is having sex with someone you love and would give everything too, something you love more than the most prize possession you have. It is the most intense feeling in the world with the one person you feel safe with and that you can share your deepest emotions with. It is like plugging into the best feeling place in the universe, having an amazing connection with a living breathing soul, and a deep and profoundly moving experience. It is about being closer to the one you love, than anyone else ever can as you enter the sacred place of your love.
And he will make the face of heaven so fine
While I do have a few sampling notes on cigars to talk about (including nice Canadian editions as well as a tasting of Davidoff Puro Doro at an event in Taormina), I would like to talk about my travel humidour in this post - and if any of you has got some good tip on how to carry around their cigars when travelling, I'm clearly all open to new suggestions. It can in fact be problematic to carry around good cigars with you. Leather case or other tubes may not be enough if you are out for a little while. It is for this reason that I decided not long ago to invest in a very useful travel humidour, shown in the pictures below.
This 1935 photomontage by John Heartfield has been coming to mind a lot. Obviously during the Bush Administration with the cutting of nearly all funding in favor of the war and its no-bid contracts. But now, just the sentiment of its main phrase. It fits the ironic joys of our time. If you can't find anything to be joyful about, find joy ironically in what is most obviously wrong. So as I look at the country, and the Republicans' concerted effort to not only maintain the idiocy of the past years, but make sure any new policies are strangled at birth if not stillborn, I look to the future and say: "Hurray! The butter is all gone!" Ah, but we still have our tax cuts, our over $250K/year tax cuts.
Get the government out of health care and education. These are the two markets most penetrated by government, and not coincidentally, the two most inefficient markets with the greatest rates of inflation.
and in other news
Everyone who follows this blog is special to me. Without you, I wouldn’t be writing the way I do, nor would I be as grateful as I am that I started writing again. Genuinely, thank you to you all for sticking with me, reading my work, and of course commenting. I read each and every one of your comments, and try my best to answer them all. You’ve no idea how much I appreciate them all, so thank you so much!
Not that Wood cared. Just as with Glen Or Glenda, this is an exercise in filming that made the most of what he had at his disposal (which were minimal to begin with). Not enough money in the budget? Allow the cast to be baptized by a local Baptist church who will fund the budget. Not enough police cars or uniforms for a scene? That's okay, Tor Johnson's son Karl can let you borrow some from where he works as a cop. Wood certainly knew how to make the most of a (really) bad situation; cheerfully ignoring people kicking down tombstones and grave markers, glossing over the fact that his lead ghoul (Lugosi) died mid-way in filming (just re-cast him with an unemployed chiropractor who was a foot taller, put a cape over his face, who will be able to tell?), film scenes of horrified humans pointing out of their car windows at the (onscreen) alien menace, and several scenes in a row featuring the same newspaper blaring the same headline in several different settings (because you KNOW this kind of a budget couldn't afford more than ONE mocked-up newspaper).
You know why? Because it wasn’t about me!
Last night was the opening party for the new Inkrat (same guys, new location) and today the sun came back.
Now moving on! In a large mixing bowl with the paddle attachment (handheld mixer works too although I never use mine), mix together 3/4 cup packed light brown sugar, 3/4 cup sugar, 1/2 cup (1 stick!) melted unsalted butter and 1 Tablespoon of vanilla extract.
"Sometimes you have an emergency and you have to do this, but he could very easily closed him up and said, 'Here are your options. You have cancer,' and the family would have said, 'We want a second opinion. This is a big deal,'" George said.
1. Indianapolis Colts QB Andrew Luck (Stanford) Why? In my opinion Peyton Manning’s days as an NFL QB are winding down and maybe even done with his recent neck fusions. Andrew Luck answers one of the many issues the Colts failed to address in their previous drafts.
Rosencrans Baldwin, Matthew Baldwin, Andrew Womack
Although the expedition of deSoto ended drastically and with little success in the venture for riches, it was one of the most elaborate and persistent efforts made by the Spaniards to explore the interior of North America. It was the first extensive exploration of at least six of the Southern states: South Carolina, Georgia, Florida, Alabama, Mississippi, and Arkansas, and their written history often begins with narratives which tell the story of de Soto's expedition. From these same narratives we also get our first description of the Cherokees, Seminoles, Creeks, Appalachians, Choctaws, and other famous tribes of southern Indians.
A groupiw asked about good places to bring kids. I thought about ignoring it, but I gotta please the fans. First off, if you can ditch the ankle biters, it would be best. They don't like standing for hours watching alt-country-punk-rock-singersong-writers. They also can't buy beer, and whine. Unfortunately, as payback, Ms. Knoxious puts me in charge of the children on Saturday. Instead of missing acts, I go out scouting for all of you parent. The best places? Ones that ignore the smoking ban...ha....I mean a parking lot or park works best. Here's my favs with children:
Coworkers are surely going to start gossiping. Either about my bloodshot eyes and how they came about or the threat of my heart exploding from the amount of coffee being consumed. Maybe both.
The main characters are likable and well developed after four novels, and you are so happy to sit down once more with some familiar friends. Admittedly this is a short novel, so some characters are stereotypes, but that doesn’t prevent the reader from enjoying the story.
In addition to Tappi Tikarrass, Kukl and the Sugarcubes, which form the bulk of Björk's discography, in between and sometimes running concurrently with those bands were numerous other musical projects involving Björk. Some of these produced vinyl evidence, others survive only as memories.
They aren't just orphans, you aren't just adopting. These are things that are close to God's heart, things that He uses to show us how Awesome and Loving of a God He is.
an invisible cloak
Ultimately the bookstore exists to serve a community, and Jeff devised a strategy to safeguard that mission. While people will always take the path of least resistance to buy a book, they still value the experience of browsing and spending time in a place that ignites their imagination. That’s the position that Harvard Book Store has defended.
revealed themselves
To update status
‘What about my father?’
:: Eating the right foods.
this year (as it is part of mine!). Wrap those last few gifts, bake those last few batches of cookies,
Basically, you are executing a package task based on a constraint which is a boolean that is returned from a stored procedure.
My goodness me, it has been quite some time since I have awarded my prestigious and internationally renowned "Prats of The Week" Award. Therefore, without further ado, I name Poole Council (regularly featured on this site)as this week's honoured recipients.
So… today (more like tonight) I’ve been trying to stay in the moment. It’s helped me to not get lower. When Mark went to Walmart and asked me if I needed anything I DID request a whole lot of alcohol… but it was pretty much a joke. Ok, so I wasn’t joking but I knew Mark would never go for it. My distraction became looking up jeans. And now writing this blog. Reassessing and reassessing some more….
Yes....... I was very pleased that I had ventured out to Jurassic park.
Unfortunately, the reality of the new racially exclusive Africanism of Mbeki and its pervasive acceptance amongst the black elite only dawned on many when he made his two nations speech. Even then the business world and whites choose to ignore it, the economy was doing just swell, and if you were wealthy so were you.
developing the generosity to share what we have
Deer bob their heads with the hope to fake you out. When a deer senses something is wrong but cant quit make it out they will head fake. They pretend to put their head down to simulate feeding and quickly lift their head back up trying to get you to move. If a deer is staring at you and for a few moments and then goes to feed don’t move until you have let him feed for a couple of minutes. So you can be sure he is really relaxed.
Sometimes I firmly believe that four kids versus one parent at bedtime is a completely unfair ratio.
Frank Lowe -Tenor Saxophone
So I thought it might be fun to play around with the idea of books that we think ought to have gotten the Printz--if the Printz had been around when they were published. Here are a couple of my nominations:
This dragonfly girl is not really finished yet, I am not sure if I should leave the background, sometimes too much can... be too much...
Live your life knowing that you are serving the purpose you intended to be here for, even if you don't know what that is, and smile.”
With you as the senior pastor, and Matt Redman and Chris Tomlin leading worship, many have been calling this a “superstar church.” What’s your take on that?
Du Ry van Beest Holle M, Meijer A, Koopmans M, de Jager C. Human-to-human transmission of avian influenza A/H7N7, The Netherlands, 2003. Euro Surveill 2005; 10: ….
6. Greensleeves (What Child is This)
The thickets blocking your path are anything
I’ve been with Hubby for nearly 6 years (it will be this June) and May 17th will mark 4 years of marriage. It hasn’t always been easy and there have been some genuinely un-fun moments, but all in all, I would never change a thing. I love being married. Hubby is, without a doubt, my best friend in the whole world. He was my best friend before we got married and we’ve certainly gotten even closer since. I simply cannot imagine life without him! He is the most charming, sweet, loving man that I’ve ever met. He looks out for me and my needs before his own all the time. He’s there for me when my social anxiety gets the better of me, always understanding, but he also pushes me into social situations because he believes I am strong enough to make it through. I can literally tell him anything in the whole wide world and he would never think less of me. His compassion knows no bounds and he loves me for who I am - just the way I am.
because you see people being crazy heading toward that separating place
Mix tamarind concentrate, fish sauce and sugar in a bowl. Throw in most of the chillies and kaffir lime leaves, setting aside a pinch of each for garnishing later, if you like. Mix well to form a marinade. If you're not into super sour flavours, taste as you add in the tamarind concentrate to reach your preferred balance.
2nd Avenue is a smaller restaurant than either Katz or Carnegie but its got a nice area here for single diners. The atmosphere is more of “a classy joint” than either of the two, as my grandfather would say.
Before the testing began, along with all the practicing and reviewing, we wrote out our "Smart Cookie" recipes. This is something I saw on pinterest! If you don't pinterest, I highly recommend that you give it a try!
With two Champions League medals, seven league titles in England and Holland as well as becoming the all time record appearance holder for the Netherland’s with 130, Van Der Sar has lived the career that many professionals can only dream.
Reports at the time of the failed May 21 prophecy indicated that perhaps up to 80% of the employees of the network actually didn’t believe his predictions, but merely stayed with the organization because it was their source of income.
Having grown up in a low-income family it’s easy for me to see that, in a town like Boardman where there is an extreme gap in household income levels, there is real pressure for lower-income families to prevent their daughters’ embarrassment brought on by a low standard of dress on a night where attire is the highlight. It may not be the same as providing food for a family (which Evangel also does, by the way), but it is still a great avenue for a group of Jesus followers to connect with their community in a meaningful, creative way.
First up comes Nipponia - a 6.5% Golden Ale made with Sorachi Ace hops (a hop bred in Japan) and Kaneko Golden - an ancient barley from Japan. (am I correct in thinking this would be a Spelt?) I've never been a fan of Sorachi Ace, I've constantly thought it smelled like Thai curry when used in a beer by itself so this will be interesting. The beer has a bizarre aroma; It's starts with lemon and straw, some light spice and some sweet malt, a tiny hint of sweet honey and pine. I'm also getting a lot of mushroom and cheesecake because Rick Furzer suggested that's what it was like for him, and I can see what he means.
Also, the exclusion applies only to acquisition debt up to $2 million, or $1 million for married taxpayers filing separately.
Pee.
It was a life of privilege to be sure, but there is an appealing pared-down simplicity to it as well. When they lived on the beach in Malibu, they lit fires in the fireplace to heat their home, she packed homemade fried chicken and strawberries with sour cream and brown sugar in Quintana's lunches and they had cucumber sandwiches for Quintana's sixteenth birthday lunch. Didion always packed the same list of simple necessities when she traveled. These small but intentional details aren't attributable so much to wealth as to taste - they're decisions and choices anyone could make.
The Syria crisis is a complicated issue. Military intervention like in Libya is completely ruled out, and rightly so. There are many anti westerners in Syria, especially the Assad supporters, who claim the uprising is a foreign conspiracy. Western troops in Syria would make a bad situation worse, and could push some moderate islamists into terrorism. You also have the fact that the west probably couldn’t manage another war, due to economic problems, and opposition from the public at yet another Middle East war. Military intervention is not the key to Syria.
I had intended to post this last night but I was finishing my data charts (that are due today) so now you have a Wednesday top ten. Enjoy - maybe this will offer you some Christmas cheer to take you through the end of the week.
Just as too many close-minded partisans perverting the practice of journalism celebrate their own uneducated, anti-Christian, bigoted missives as fact thereby reinforcing their perceived stereotypes.
The rites and rhetoric of Christianity began to ring hollow to me when I entered adolescence. Christ never disappointed me, but I felt that the church was just another institution staffed by cold bureaucrats. I was sick of well-dressed professionals sitting behind polished desks with pat answers and fat wallets. I needed something deep and real and personal, and instead I found something empty and shallow and phony. I began to ask many questions of leaders and parishioners, and the answers I got seemed rehearsed and stale. One lady told me I was too intense and that there was a danger I might go “over the deep end.” I told her it was much better than the shallow end.
- I say: Why didn’t Rick just say, “Shane tried to shoot me in the back so I had to defend myself”.
And after a quick walk through the gardens (after all it had stopped raining), appreciation of the view, we retreated to our Chums Villa – which was toasty warm from the fire and slept like babies only to awake eight hours later by the gentle tweeting of birds.
(The ouch is in anticipation of what she'll do when she sees my chosen career.)
As for the liquidity features, these can be triggered after purchase, while the annuitant is still alive, says Baker. These features include return-of-premium, cash withdrawal (full, partial, or accelerated), and commutation. The partial cash withdrawal feature started showing up in income contracts about three or four years ago, Baker recalls. They typically allow the owner to take out 12 months of payments in a single check one time during the life of the contract, though a few may allow more than one time. The average age of the SPIA buyer in the CANNEX database is 70, and the average single premium this year is $225,000. “The distribution firms are telling me that clients are putting from 20 to 40 percent of their life savings at age 70 into these products,” Baker says. “They are using the income payments to help cover basic living expenses, and keeping the rest of their portfolios invested and their legacy plans in place.”
You will have until SUNDAY 6/12 at 11:59 EST.
The cab arrives, but Vinnie heads off with some other people. At the after party, he takes his grand old time before coming my way. Factor to the lowest common denominator of I’m confused, I guesstimate my chances at 50%. Starting to think I’m too drunk for dating-equations tonight, but there’s still tomorrow.
If the boy was left unaware
Whether a lie is told outright or eluded to—we should take a look at a few of the reasons why lies of all kinds are told as related to our recovery.
click the image to enlarge
Frederick J. Hoffmann, 53, Freehold, N.J.
LOUISVILLE, Ky.–The Division II Bulletin has ranked the Bellarmine University men’s basketball team as the preseason No. 1 team in the country, and the publication gave Braydon Hobbs and Jeremy Kendle preseason accolades as well.
There is an ideological industry at stake and in need of a high profile balancing prosecution.
The roadblock is back at the end of our road and all cars are being thoroughly searched.
This is this weeks in house commercial all produced and created here at MMG! We do alot of video work within the automotive sector on a weekly basis and now that we have a blog, we can talk about it! We’ll be posting alot of our past video productions on this blog, but for this post we’re going with our most recent creation. This video is for CHAMPION CHRYSLER JEEP DODGE in Downey, California. The script was written by the producer and sent to us to get the voice over recorded and then create the video. We went to our lovely and talented artist Andrea Becker for that, and after a day…she sent the final voice over back. Everything turned out perfect, so we started the edit. For these type of INTERNET SPOTS we tend to use a variety of video footage, stills, effects, and moving text to keep the pace rolling. We are a member of ISTOCK and tend to use most of their photos and some video for these projects (along with branded logos, website, etc.). On this one, we weren’t sure what song we want to use and decided to put together our own using various sound loops. We slapped down the VO and song, then started in on the edit. After a day and a half of editing, we were done and it was ready to be sent off for approval. Here’s the final product, hope you guys like it!
I know many people who simply cannot live without music – listening to it, creating it, participating in it with passion. I have nothing but respect and admiration for those musical souls. My sister plays the piano, my brother is an actual composer married to a real live singer/songwriter, and I took no less than a month (ok, maybe three weeks) of piano lessons in second grade. Yet somehow, despite those musical influences and despite my significant Billy Joel, Fleetwood Mac, Kenny Loggins and Bruce Springsteen phases of life, I have failed to nurture any sort of musical connection in my adult life.
Was it a drift voyage?
- 1/2 tsp baking soda
In neighbouring Moreleta Park, Mr Johan Bester and his wife, his daughter, his mother and his mother-in-law had all been relaxing at home when the group of armed men burst in and held them at gun-point. They were all tied up and the men took what they wanted and left in a VW Golf. Mr Bester was able to free himself and proceded to give chase after the men. He took with him only his hand-gun and his cell-phone and was dressed only in shorts and socks. He apparently said on the phone, while he was in pursuit, that he would chase them until they crashed their vehicle into a tree. These words turned out to be profetic as the men turned off Hans Strydom drive into Pierre van Ryneveld and then took the corner into Melville street at high speed. Unable to negotiate the corner they drove straight into a large tree on the pavement and all piled out of the vehicle and took flight on foot. From there they split up and it was at this point that local members of the Pierre van Ryneveld Community Police Forum, as well as other local residents took up the chase. Initially only one of the four was captured but due to the sterling work of members of the Lyttleton Police Department, the other three were eventually caught. The trail led them all the way back to Mamelodi where they caught the last member of the group at approximately 21:00 that night.
Here is the teaser vid for the wedding we shot in Japan. The wedding day was so incredible, everything about it was new to me, so beautiful and the traditions were a once in a lifetime experience! I truly enjoyed working with this couple, hope you enjoy!!
They got up, unplugged the Computer, and threw out my wine.
In addition to the Lemon Sugar Cookies, I also made my Easter standby: Mini-Egg Nest Cookies. The recipe for those is simple: Take your favourite chocolate chip recipe, mix it up but leave out the chocolate chips. Drop cookie-sized amounts onto a baking sheet, then top with 1 to 3 Cadbury Mini Eggs and bake as usual! I usually do very small cookies (a teaspoon-sized amount of dough), with only one egg, but this time I decided to make them a bit bigger. Or you could mix the eggs right into the dough.
Bieber fever that is. Justin Bieber is home. It's big news. I drove by where he was while explaining to little girls about privacy and respect and I hope others take care to treat him and his adorable girlfriend that way as they spend time with his family this week. Then I tweeted him hello from the girls just to make the kids happy. It worked. They were satisfied.
at Kafka on the shore.
Mosaics”, were funded by 4 local groups, including the Parks Board for City of Vancouver. There are over 20 different mosaic installations in this area– at the park entrance, by the wading and spray pool, park benches and by children’s sandbox area.
I later told the monkey that “catamite” was a more polite word than “bitch”, but either word was less prudent than keeping his mouth shut. The monkey who casts aspersions on a gorilla’s private life does so at his own peril.
If you don’t beer blog. Start straight away. You don’t have to be any good at it. I mean, look at this load of tripe I knock up. Barely literate, inarticulate tosh. But still nice people want to give you grog. It’s win win.
I have a hard time saying no to taking on work from clients,
Milwaukee Brewers
John Munro – acoustic and electric guitars, mandolin, vocals;
Joe Blanton, your fucking IN.
The star at the top of the last piece, ignored by the figures lying in the streets has now been internalized by them. They’ve raised their glasses and that heavenly star has spilled forth into their hearth, filling them with the light of life and joy.
Skylarks singing and spiralling high up in the sky:
Did one of my regular monthly patrols last night checking the streetlights and illuminated signs.
“If it’s not regulations, it’s compliance,” Borislow said. “Our advisor’s role will become even more critical, because people need us to get through the complexity of products, needs and services. Even just understanding the insurance exchange, how their benefits work in conjunction with the exchange and what compliance and audits have to happen, have all become huge issues for our clients.”
sales cycle through to deal closure. The ISE acts as the prime quota own in the territory space
Wednesday, November 16th – Special Guest, Matt Lamb (Derrick’s Dad)
An M4 relief road was considered in the 1990’s and in the late 2000’s during the period of the One Wales Government (2007 – 2011) but it was finally dropped because of excessive cost. What followed was a systematic programme of enhancing the existing motorway, with improvements to the carriageway and the introduction of variable speed limits.
http://www.grammar.net/iwishiwere says: “Was” is used in situations where the statement might once have been or could be a reality. This verb mood is called “indicative”. These subtle differences once enabled a speaker to “indicate” something without using more words to spell it out.
To ask whether women are capable of leadership is to begin by asking the wrong question. Indeed the question of whether Kenyan women can lead was answered generations ago. YES WE CAN (and we have been)!
This is a bit of an experiment (and you can see why — in terms of relevance — once you skim the list). These are the Top 10 articles for the past month based upon individual article page views.
Marty: "Doc, about the future--"
Used to be it was just four taps, but they recently doubled that. They're well-selected and wholly local. Nevertheless, this is still a movie theater--there's a separate line for where you buy food if you're going to watch a movie, and they sell popcorn and candy. So tonight, while waiting to order up a couple cold ones, the woman in line in front of us asked about the IPAs. She was about fifty years old and dressed stylishly and expensively.
I love reading history and for anyone trying to figure out the trends occurring worldwide there is no better way of understanding what is occurring now. Why Nations Fail: The Origins of Power, Prosperity, and Poverty by Daron Acemoglu and James A. Robinson ($30.00, Crown) addresses and answers questions that have stumped the experts for centuries. Acemoglu is the Killian Professor of Economics at MIT and Robinson is a political scientists and economist, an expert on Latin America and Africa, teaches at Harvard. The book is a hefty tome, but reads smoothly as the authors explore why some nations are wealthy and others are poor. One example is the border between the U.S. and Mexico. Some nations have had several revolutions without any real change in the way they are governed. Egypt is such an example. The authors address the question of whether America’s best days are behind it and whether China authoritarian growth machine is sustainable. Without giving away any secrets, the answer to the question of growth and failure is freedom. Put this book on your reading list this year. Charles Goyette has written Red and Blue and Broke All Over: Restoring America’s Free Economy ($25.95, Sentinel, an imprint of the Penguin Group) takes a look at our present crisis from a libertarian point of view and, not surprisingly concludes that the increasing size of government, crony capitalism, and too much spending has brought us to the brink of a financial crisis even greater than what occurred in 2008. It is a thought-provoking book and very timely. Sometimes you cannot improve on an author’s own description of what he has written. I am a fan of James D. Best’s novels based on the old West and the early days of the American Republic, so I was not surprised that he turned his hand to non-fiction to write Principled Action: Lessons from the Origins of the American Republic ($13.95, Wheatmark, Tucson, AZ, softcover). “Prior to 1776, world history was primarily written about kings and emperors. The American experiment shook the world. Not only did the colonies break away from the biggest and most powerful empire in history, they took the musings of the brightest thinkers of the Enlightenment and implemented them. The Founding of the United States was simultaneously an armed rebellion against tyranny and a revolution of ideas-ideas that changed the course of world history. Principled Action shows how the Founders built this great nation with sacrifice, courage, and steadfast principles.” There is no more important time in our present times to learn the how and why of the founding of our great republic. This highly readable book is a very good place to start.
Josh fills the now refashioned position recently vacated by Jesse Williams. Thanks to Jesse for all his contributions while at NABC.
I haven’t done any good hard yoga for more than a week! UGH! But I have been packing, cleaning, packing and doing some more cleaning. Does that count as working out? It doesn’t count as yoga at all, but maybe some slight cardio.
In the comment section, some said, 'learn to laugh...learn to learn...and enjoy what you have learned'. Some offered sympathy. Some advised 'smile often'. One reader suggested a must read: 'Allegory of the Cave' from Plato as being all you need to know. (You can bet I'll be looking that one up.)
You always know who really rides their bike, and who only rides it so they can park it somewhere and stand next to it. As silly as those reflector-suited guys look on their BMWs, you know they ride some serious miles. Likewise, no one goes through the pain to squeeze sausage-like into riding leathers to just stand and bake in the Florida heat and humidity (PU!!). Additionally, comfy jeans and a t-shirt doesn’t mean you don’t eat up the miles. But if your outfit is too coordinated, you just look silly. Really, high heeled riding boots? Chaps with your butt hanging out? Ironed jeans?
Once physical contact occurred, did Martin exert a level of physical force causing injury or threat of injury to a degree a reasonable person under the same circumstances as Zimmerman would conclude deadly force was justified?
